Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
Number of Reviews
39

Author
James Sanford
         If science can make sharks super-intelligent, why can't it do
the same for screenwriters?
 That's the question posed by "Deep Blue Sea," a thriller set in an
undersea lab where medical researcher Susan McAlester (Saffron Burrows)
and her crew are being hunted by predators of their own creation. The
essentials of the storyline are best summed up by McAlester's hypertense
co-worker Tom (Michael Rapaport): "She screwed with the sharks, and now
the sharks are screwin' with us!".
 Directed by Renny Harlin, the man who gave us "Die Hard 2: Die
Harder" and "Cliffhanger" when he was at his peak and the infamous
"Cutthroat Island" at his nadir, "Sea" is essentially a series of
explosions and crises, occasionally interrupted by stern warnings about
the consequences of fooling around with Mother Nature. The movie is so
poorly written it's almost laughable, but it does provide a few genuine
jolts, which is more than can be said for most of the current crop of
horror films.
 "Sea" begins with McAlester inviting financier Russell Franklin
(Samuel L. Jackson) to her base of operations, in hope of convincing him
not to cut off funding for her quest to find a cure for Alzheimer's
Disease. She and her staff have been using "hormonal enhancers" to
tinker with the brains of a trio of sharks at their Aquatica compound
and McAlester is certain a breakthrough is just around the corner.
 Unfortunately, so is a typhoon, which devestates Aquatica and
nearly kills everyone in it. Soon the hallways are flooded, the escape
routes are impassable and the humans are turning into snacks for their
toothy pet monsters.
 "These sharks aren't just breaking down doors for the fun of
it," Franklin realizes. "They're after us!" Most of the major lines in
"Sea" are followed by exclaimation points; the rest of the insipid
dialogue by first-time writers Duncan Kennedy, Wayne Powers and Donna
Powers is either mumbled or drowned out by the thousands of gallons of
water that wash over the cast at regular intervals.
 Among those struggling to survive alongside Franklin and
McAlester are daredevil Carter Blake (Thomas Jane), simpering Janice
(Jacqueline McKenzie) and a Gospel-spouting cook nicknamed Preach (LL
Cool J), whose sidekick is a profanity-spouting parrot -- really. None
of the actors is required to do much more than shriek, swim or scramble
to get out of the scene as quickly as possible. Those who like to see
dismemberment up close will be delighted by Harlin's insistance that we
get a look at every severed arm and leg in full, bloody detail.
 The attacks -- at least one of which is a real surprise -- are
generally exciting, although someone should have informed the authors
that just because a shark may have increased his brain size does not
necessarily mean he'll know how to turn on an oven, as one does here in
the movie's most ludicrous sequence. For a movie about the advancement
of knowledge, "Sea" is often flabbergastingly dumb. James Sanford

Author
James Brundage
Written by Duncan Kennedy, Donna Powers, and Wayne Powers
Starring Samuel L. Jackson, Saffron Burrows, Thomas Jane, Stellan Skarsgard,
LL Cool J, Michael Rappaport, and Jaqueline McKenzie
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 All right.  I have almost forgiven Village Roadshow for their fiasco of
Practical Magic.  After Analyze This and The Matrix, they were starting to
get on my good side.  Of course, when I started seeing previews for Deep
Blue Sea, I assumed that it would be a complete Jaws rip off and, because of
that, Village Roadshow would be back to bad in my book.
 Deep Blue Sea is, in fact, a complete Jaws rip off.  From start to finish,
it has not an original bone in its body.  But technically sharks don't have
bone, they have cartilage, so I guess originality doesn't have to matter as
much with this one.  Scientific explanations of why this movie can be so
technically bad (mediocre F/Xs, bad performances, no plot) and yet be so
incredibly fun aside, Deep Blue Sea is a nice fun-in-the-sun movie to watch
during the summer of 99.
 Renny Harlin, director of The Long Kiss Goodnight and Cliffhanger handles
action as well as he always did: nearly perfect.  He knows how to handle his
actors, he knows how to work with a terrible script, and he knows when it's
good to be over the top and when it's good to stick to your guns.  In sync
with Harlin's usual directorial style, we have a lot of the old fashioned
action scenes (swim from sharks, shoot at sharks, have sharks bite body
parts off) thrown at you along with some not so traditional ones (watch
sharks swim backwards, watch shark trap man in oven, watch shark make clever
use of a human body as a way to break glass).  Why is all of this?  Because,
in Deep Blue Sea, we have sharks that are as smart as human beings (and, as
shown by most of the idiots we see in everyday life, probably smarter).
 Deep Blue Sea's plot, if you can call it a plot, concerns an obsessed
scientist (Saffron Burrows), an investor that survived an avalanche in the
Himalayas (Samuel L. Jackson), various research scientists (Stellan
Skarsgard, Michael Rappaport, and Jacqueline McKenzie), a shark-wrangler
(Thomas Jane) and a wise-ass cook (LL Cool J), all of whom are being hunted
by genetically altered sharks who have larger brains than normal and are as
smart as humans.  With all of the dark glee of a B-horror film, we watch as
the sharks devour everyone in sight, manipulate the humans, and try to
outsmart them.
And, of course, we root for the sharks more than we care about the humans.
Of course the humans win anyways, and of course we have an oh so politically
correct ending.  But hey, that's not really the point of the film.  It's
summer, and the point is to have fun, no matter how idiotic the fun is.
Deep Blue Sea is worlds past the horror/comedy Lake Placid, the other
monster film involving a natural creature with unnatural characteristics,
actually going so far as to make you do more than chuckle a couple of times.
Along with my dark sense of humor, I ended up laughing as one of the people
was chomped right in the middle of a highly esoteric and idiotic speech.
Forewarnings, however, that go along with this film are that it is both
highly stupid and highly predictable.  Those in the mood for plot twists or
intelligence should seek elsewhere.  It has no literary value or
qualifications whatsoever.  It is not just not high art; it isn't even low
art.  What Deep Blue Sea undeniably is would be fun.  Take everything else
away, and Deep Blue Sea is and still will be fun.

Author
R.L. Strong
WARNER BROS. PRESENTS
IN ASSOCIATION WITH VILLAGE ROADSHOW PICTURES * GROUCHO II FILM PARTNERSHIP
AN ALAN RICHE * TONY LUDWIG/AKIVA GOLDSMAN PRODUCTION
A RENNY HARLIN FILM  
"DEEP BLUE SEA"  
SAFFRON BURROWS   THOMAS JANE LL COOL J   JACQUELINE McKENZIE  
MICHAEL RAPAPORT STELLAN SKARSGARD AND  SAMUEL L. JACKSON
MUSIC BY TREVOR RABIN  
CO-PRODUCER REBECCA SPIKINGS
EXECUTIVE PRODUCERS  DUNCAN HENDERSON AND BRUCE BERMAN
WRITTEN BY DUNCAN KENEDY AND DONNA POWERS & WAYNE POWERS
PRODUCED BY AKIVA GOLDSMAN  TONY LUDWIG  ALAN RICHE
DIRECTED BY RENNY HARLIN
What to do? What to do? You're trapped on an oceanic research facility
being chased by super intelligent sharks that you have created. Well,
in the movies the one thing you cannot do, is stay out of the
water. Renny Harlin's latest action thriller, "DEEP BLUE SEA" is an
enjoyable popcorn muncher. There's not weight to the film, but there
are enough solid jolts and action to keep this summer's audiences
satiated until the lines shorten for 'The Blair Witch Project'.
The story opens with two couples enjoying a nice catamaran ride off
the coast of Baja California. As the young people romance and cuddle,
a very large and toothy Mako shark rams their boat. As the kids are
plunged into the water, all seems lost until the shark is harpooned
and captured by Carter Blake (Thomas Jane).  We are then transported
to the boardroom of Russell Franklin (Samuel L.  Jackson),
multi-millionaire and head of a major corporation. Mr. Franklin is
ready to pull the plug on a secret research facility off the coast of
Baja, as a result of the shark escape. Brilliant biologist Susan
McAlester (Saffron Burrows) pleads with the powerful investor, claming
that her research will end with a cure for Alzheimer's disease.
Returning to the facility, McAlester shows Franklin the work being
done.  Franklin takes an interest in Blake, knowing the young man's
history and problems with the law. Again, he is unconvinced that the
project is viable, until he is brought to the lab.
In the lab, one of three altered sharks is caught and set up for
microsurgery. A small amount of fluid from the shark's brain case is
extracted and then mixed with inactive human brain cells. In a few
seconds, the cells start to come to life, proving Dr. McAlester's
theory. Unfortunately, the shark awakens and bites off the arm of one
of the other doctors. All this transpires as a tropical storm
approaches. As a rescue helicopter flies in to transport the injured
Scientist to the mainland, accidents happen causing the helicopter to
crash into the main radio tower of the facility. Amid much fire and
explosion, the science lab starts to flood, and the sharks see their
chance at some fresh food.
"Deep Blue Sea" is an enjoyable programmer. No classic by any means,
but a good solid piece of entertainment. As with most films of this
type, logic gives way to action and thrills. And 'Deep Blue Sea'
delivers some solid if silly thrills.  You know within the first
half-hour, which of the cast members are going to become shark
fodder. The film most closely resembles a 'Friday, the 13th' slasher
film, in that people are always walking into the wrong room at the
wrong time, and the only way out is the most perilous one. But the
film succeeds in giving the audience what it came to see, big sharks,
great to moderate visual effects, and a few good "jump out of your
seat" scares.
The performances are uniformly good, with LL Cool J, making the most
of his characterization. His 'Dudley', the cook of the facility has a
nice screen presence and his comical relationship between his pet
parrot, the sharks and the emergency at hand play very well. Thomas
Jane as Shark wrangler Carter Blake fills the requited hero role
adequately enough as he's not called upon to do much more with his
character. Saffron Burrows as Dr. McAlester fills the necessary
Sigorney Weaver part well enough (in one scene even disrobing a la
'Alien's Ripley). But to be honest, no one in the film has much of an
arc. The pace of the film doesn't call for in depth character study.
Renny Harlin has crafter a fine and enjoyable summer movie here. His
set ups and executions are as good as anything he's done before. There
are (surprisingly) little references to other films, at least
glaringly so. Most of the situations are lifted from other films, but
are executed with a nice wit and steady directorial hand. One
enjoyable sequence is wherein 'Dudley' is trapped in his own oven as
the kitchen floods. The super intelligent shark continually rams the
door of the oven and the controls finally succeeding in turning the
oven on to 500 degrees. This is a wonderfully creative and humorous
scene.
The script by DUNCAN KENEDY, DONNA POWERS and WAYNE POWERS is a fast
paced thrill ride. The lapses in logic and the curious lack of science
in the later half of the film doesn't derail the film as drastically
as it could. This is a chase film pure and simple.
The biggest problem with the film are it's special effects. While some
scenes are riveting in their visceral quality, others are just clearly
laughable in their execution. One scene in particular, wherein one
character is attacked by one of the sharks, it's massive bulk and
weight have no effect on the surrounding environment. This may not be
a big complaint, unless one notices that the shark actually seems to
cut right through a submersible vehicle as it attacks. But that goes
along well enough with the rest of the film.
"Deep Blue Sea" is won't win any grand accolades or awards. But for a
quick thrill ride on a Saturday night. You could find worse choices.
On a scale of 1 to 5, "Deep Blue Sea" rates a land lovin' 3. An
enjoyable escapist thriller from one our most maligned talents. This
film may give Renny Harlin the chance to do a really good film.
Here's hoping!
Copyright =A9 1999 R. L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed without the
expressed written permission of the author.
Visit the Dungeonmaster Cornucopia of Film
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Makeup/5594/reviews/main.html

Author
Michael Dequina
In this most uncommonly eclectic summer of films--which has offered just
about everything from record-shattering space epics to potty-mouthed
animated kids--it's ironic that the one thing that has been missing is
_the_ typical summertime staple: the all-out, full-throttle action
extravaganza.  Leave it to popcorn director extraordinaire Renny Harlin
to fill the void in explosive fashion with his exciting super-shark
thriller _Deep_Blue_Sea_.
The killer shark theme of _Deep_Blue_Sea_ will inevitably (and
understandably) invite comparison to _Jaws_.  However, Harlin's film is
more reminiscent of the _Alien_ films, with a group of people trapped in
a confined space as murderous monsters stalk the halls: in this case,
three sharks that have large, genetically-altered brains--and a larger
appetite for blood to match.  If one must describe _Deep_Blue_Sea_ in
terms of other films, the best way to do so would be as "_Aliens_ meets
_Jaws_ meets _The_Abyss_," for the sea laboratory setting also means that
our human cast must also evade, as in that third film, violent rushes of
water.
If I said there weren't much more going on in _Deep_Blue_Sea_ aside from
sharks chasing people, I'd only be half lying.  There is a plot behind
the mayhem; something about how the enhanced sharks are part of scientist
Susan McAlester's (Saffron Burrows) experiments in developing a way to
regenerate human brain tissue.  But all plot pretty much goes out the
window once the first of her three test sharks breaks loose, setting off
a chain reaction of events that traps Susan and five others (played by
Samuel L. Jackson, LL Cool J, Thomas Jane, Michael Rapaport, and
Jacqueline McKenzie) aboard the lab facility, which floats somewhere in
the ocean.
Of course, Harlin does take a break here and there from the ensuing
action in the interest of plot.  In theory, this would make this thrill
ride a bit more well-rounded, but the dialogue scenes play as excess
baggage--and often of the most ludicrous variety.  Many of the quieter
moments were met with derisive laughter by the audience, and it's no
surprise considering how laughable much of writers Duncan Kennedy, Donna
Powers, and Wayne Powers's dialogue is.  The characters (and actors) are
pretty much faceless mice placed into an experimental maze, and the
heavyhanded "dramatic" moments meant to correct the situation just end up
hurting the film.
Despite the hamfisted stabs at dramatic substance, Harlin never loses
his wicked sense of fun, best exemplified by how one character's
earnestly over-the-top monologue is punctuated by the fatal chomp of a
shark.  Fun is the intent of pictures such as _Deep_Blue_Sea_, and Harlin
delivers the goods, as he has many times in the past (most recently in
the underrated 1996 machisma-fueled shoot-'em-up
_The_Long_Kiss_Goodnight_).  Those breath-catching pauses for talk do not
derail the propulsive momentum of the film, which is essentially one long
run from the water and sharks.  There may be no emotional attachment to
any of the characters (though LL Cool J's wisecracking chef proved to be
an audience favorite, and indie stalwart Jane ably holds down the action
hero role), but the suspense and fright factor are definitely felt as
they are hunted down by the trio of sharks.
_Deep_Blue_Sea_ is indeed a triumph of Harlin's style over a lack of
substance, but when the results are as exciting and exhilarating as this
fast-paced thrill ride, any such complaint is moot.  After all, what more
can anyone ask from an unpretentious piece of pure action escapism?
On the other hand, "exciting" and "exhilarating" aren't the words I'd
use to describe the season's other "killer creature in the water" movie,
_Lake_Placid_.  "Bizarre" is more like it.  I hesitate to call Steve
Miner's film, in which a giant crocodile gobbles up anyone who sets foot
in a still Maine lake either a thriller or a comedy, and not because it
fairly seamlessly blends both of those genres.  It's that it doesn't do
either aspect much justice.  The "scare" sequences fail to do so,
especially due to the less-than-effective croc effects; and the humorous
touches thrown in by writer David E. Kelley--yes, the same David E.
Kelley responsible for such TV series as _Ally_McBeal_ and
_The_Practice_--aren't so much smart as they are silly.  The cast, which
is led by Bill Pullman, Bridget Fonda, Oliver Platt, Brendan Gleeson, and
an amusingly foul-mouthed Betty White, is game enough, but they cannot
elevate the weak material beyond the watchable junk level.
Michael Dequina
twotrey@juno.com | michael_jordan@geocities.com |
jordan_host@sportsmail.com | mrbrown@iname.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site:  http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline:  http://www.HollywoodHotline.com
on ICQ: #25289934  |  on AOL Instant Messenger: MrBrown23


Author
Homer Yen
DBS is a film that follows a formulaic storytelling mechanism that is
as familiar to us as the smell of buttered popcorn.  And if you've ever
seen any of the `Alien' movies, then in many ways, you've already seen
this film.  The similarities between these films are as abundant as the
gory shark attacks that are peppered throughout this film.  In `Alien',
the setting is a remote research station somewhere in space.  Here, the
setting is a research station somewhere in the Pacific Ocean.  In
`Alien' a band of humans must survive to escape an infestation of
oozing, flesh-eating creatures.  Here, a band of humans must survive to
escape several very, very large sharks on the loose.  But these are no
ordinary sharks.  These predators are 25 feet long, and their brains
have been altered in a way as to make them amazingly intelligent,
agile, and menacing.
The research station is headed by Dr. Susan McAlester (Saffron
Burrows), a passionate scientist on the verge of a discovery that could
change the face of medicine.  As humans age, brain activity slows down
considerably.  As a result many suffer greatly from degenerative
diseases, such as Alzheimer's.  Yet sharks, for some reason, never
suffer from these effects.  Their brains remain fully functional
throughout their life span.  Her project is to find a way to extract
the protein within the shark's brain responsible for this effect so
that humans can take advantage of these benefits too  sort of a super
gingko biloba.  But she faces some overwhelming obstacles.  Funding has
been cut which forces her to take shortcuts and to overlook safety
precautions.  Meanwhile, to extract enough protein, the sharks' brains
have been genetically altered.  The side effect is that it makes them
more ferocious and smarter.  And did I mention that these beasts are 25
feet long?  It's a recipe for disaster, and when the sharks eventually
grow smart enough to fight back, the woeful few crew members on this
isolated research station will become nothing more than feeder fish. 
I think that when looking at a movie such as this, there are two
components that will determine whether something like this can be
recommended or not.  One is whether we like the hapless souls fighting
to stay alive.  And for the most part, I liked the quirky cast of
characters, especially the macho shark wrangler (Thomas Jane) and a
delightful bible-quoting cook (LL Cool J).  The shark wrangler is
well-suited to stay alive, but his crazy heroics may get him killed. 
Meanwhile, when a shark enters the cook's partially flooded kitchen, he
tries to hide in his own oven.  But the shark is smart enough to set
the oven to 400 degrees.  Perhaps, this shark prefers his dinner
cooked.  To be sure, many will meet an untimely and unexpected horrible
end.  But these are two characters that I cared for and wanted to see
survive.  The other component, of course, is the action sequences. 
And, for the most part, they are all well done.  They involve the
familiar scenes where fierce creatures are chasing after humans through
narrow passageways while the whole compound around them is slowly about
to self-destruct.  Meanwhile, the characters all do their best to
escape from the jaws of death, do what they can to improvise their way
out of seemingly hopeless situations, and work together to make it to
freedom.


Author
Gary Jones
Deep Blue Sea is a big budget 'B'-movie in which scientists in an
undersea medical research laboratory produce super-smart sharks and pay
the price as the fiendish fish decide to get their own back on the pesky
interfering boffins. (As is usual in Hollywood movies, scientists are
portrayed as brilliant but misguided, and blinded by ambition to the
consequences of their actions.) 
Director Renny Harlin is a competent action film helmsman, but seems not
to care too much about the quality of the script he is working with or
the performances of his actors - his Die Hard 2 was a poor sequel mainly
because its script didn't come close to matching the wit and detail of
character of the original film. In Deep Blue Sea, Harlin seems to have
abandoned any notion of believable plot or convincing characters. The
dialogue piles cliche on cliche ("give me 48 hours"... "it's your call")
and much of the plot is idiotic. Samuel L. Jackson plays the financial
backer visiting the laboratory to check up on his investment. Most of
the time he looks as if he has just wandered onto the set, bewildered
about how he's ended up appearing in this movie. The rest of the cast is
generally pretty lame, although Michael Rapaport is fine as an irritable
and jumpy engineer. The most memorable portrayal, though, comes from
Saffron Burrows, who as the lab's unfeasibly attractive chief scientist
gives what must be one of the worst leading performances of the year.
Given the lines she has to deliver, and the credibility-stretching
things she has to do, such as stripping off to her microscopic underwear
in order to avoid an electric shock, a good performance was probably
unimaginable.
If Deep Blue Sea were just that little bit worse, it could be taken as a
parody, but unfortunately it's not quite that bad. The defence that it's
all just a bit of fluff - a bit of lightweight hokum - is no excuse for
laziness. In an apparent attempt to take the wind out of the sails of
criticisms that this is just a Jaws rip-off, the film-makers have
included some clear references to the mother-of-all fish movies,
including a similar opening sequence and Samuel L. Jackson's spoof of
Quint's USS Indianapolis speech. But such winking at the audience
doesn't really excuse the film's shortcomings.
The one interesting feature of the film, and the thing which nearly
saves it, is the way monster-movie conventions of who gets killed, and
when, are turned on their head. After a few characters have been turned
to fish food in some quite startling ways, we really don't know who's
going to get ripped to shreds next. The sharks themselves are nicely
done - if sometimes a little too obviously CGI'd - and the suspense and
action sequences in the sunken laboratory are handled well, as we'd
expect, but the good things about the film can't disguise its essential
tackiness. Deep Blue Sea tries for a similar feel to the year's other
lightweight Hollywood blockbuster The Mummy, but whereas The Mummy seems
to be the work of smart people having some whimsical fun, Deep Blue Sea
appears to have been produced by people too dumb or too lazy to do any
better. 
-- 
Gary Jones 
Homepage: www.bohr.demon.co.uk
PGP public key available from servers (DH/DSS key ID: 0x11EAE903)

Author
Frankie Paiva
Hot on the heels of Lake Placid, which was more of a campy horror comedy than
deadly animal horror movie, Deep Blue Sea comes to sweep us away with yet
another gory creature feature.
Dr. Susan McAlester (Burrows) is a scientist whose father died of Alzheimer's,
she is very close to discovering the cure from inside a shark's brain. She
works at the huge Aquatica, an above and underground research lab that houses
three testing sharks. One day when Carter (Thomas Jane) is out feeding the
sharp-toothed animals they try to hunt him down, but swim backwards when they
can't. This is met with shocking discovery as sharks can't swim backwards, the
only way they could is if something slipped them something, but of course,
that's against company policy.
A storm blows out all communications on the island and the group (along with
Samuel L. Jackson) is caught inside the ship. Susan is up to foul play by
giving the sharks more protein than they need, thus making them smarter. The
sharks begin to chase and chomp everyone around, and it's an exciting rush. 
LL Cool J appears as a cook, he's quite good and he steals most of the scenes
he's in. It proves that there could be room for him in Hollywood as an actor.
Finally there is someone in one of these movies that never gives up, and comes
up with creative ways of getting away from the bad guy. Burrows also makes a
good female lead and this should get her more star attention. Since there are
no big actors, the film is more suspenseful than the standard horror/sci-fi
flick, whereas in other movies ("OK, everyone except Jamie Lee Curtis or
Sigourney Weaver get killed, etc.) where it's predictable who will live and who
will die, it's all a mystery here.
People that liked Lake Placid that come to this one expecting the same laughs
won't get what they are looking for. On the other hand, those expecting Lake
Placid to be scary will find what they were looking for here.
In other words, if you want a thriller that doesn't require a lot of thinking,
go see Deep Blue Sea, it gets my ** 1/2 stars of choice.

Author
Chuck Schwartz
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews: Deep Blue Sea
Rated [R], 110 minutes
Starring Samuel L. Jackson, Saffron Burrows, Thomas Jane, Michael
Rapaport and LL Cool J
Screenplay by Duncan Kennedy and Donna Powers & Wayne Powers
Directed by Renny Harlin
website: http://www.deepbluesea.net
IN SHORT: Smart Sharks. Human sushi. Yum.
As far as investment dollars are concerned, this week's wide release of
The Blair Witch Project has got the majors running scared. As far as us
folk that pay hard earned dollars for thrills and chills, the better
investment (as far as Cranky is concerned) is Renny Harlin's Deep Blue
Sea. The e-mail that's come in to Cranky indicates folks either adore or
detest Witch, with no evident middle ground. Deep Blue Sea, on the other
hand, almost requires an extra large popcorn and soda, so that the
greasy golden topping stuff can go splattering all over your date when
you applaud at the end of the flick. Even if you don't rave, you won't
feel cheated by this top notch popcorn flick.
OK, enough preaching. Let's get down to the nitty gritty chomp chomp.
A lovely moonlit night. Two collegiate couples on a sailboat. Girls in
bikinis, men pouring wine and a boombox booming out suitably appropriate
music. This night was not made for skinny dipping, or anything else
previously filmed 20 years ago in Jaws. This time out, it isn't a case
of prehistoric killing machine following genetic programming to lunch on
human flesh. This time the mako shark, bred in captivity as part of
experiments designed to find a cure for Alzheimer's Disease, has
deliberately attacked. How he escaped from captivity at the Aquatica
research lab is unknown. What is known is that, when Wall Street hears
the story, prime investor Russell Franklin (Samuel L. Jackson) is going
to be out $200 million or so. With 48 hours to prove her experiments can
keep Franklin out of the poorhouse, Dr. Susan McAlester (Saffron
Burrows) pushes her research team to the limit.
One thing you should know about the mako. It's fast. It's intelligent
and illegal DNA enhancements as part of the experiments have made it
even smarter. You know this from the trailer and commercial. What you
don't know, yet, is that there are two generations of mako shark
resident at Aquatica. Gen-1 tips the scales at an even ton in a fifteen
foot package. Gen-2 adds ten feet and three more tons of mean. They hunt
in packs. They can swim backwards. They know where all the security
cameras are. Just like any prison inmate, they are biding their time,
taking stock of the human sushi on the station: shark expert Carter
Blake (Thomas Jane), who likes to swim with the beasts; marine
biologists Janice Higgins (Jaqueline McKenzie) and love-of-her-life Jim
Whitlock (Stellan Skarsgard); engineer Tom Scoggins (Michael Rapaport)
and evangelist cook Sherman "Preacher" Dudley (LL Cool J). Pick your
favorite and place your bets on who survives.
The gimmick is great: it isn't man hunting shark on the wide open ocean,
which is the classic. It's shark hunting man inside all of the security
precautions designed to keep man safe and protected from the elements
(until a freak accident and a raging storm break those defenses) and
from the power of the genetically bred animals (who are a lot stronger
than they look). The effects, a combination of animatronics, real
footage and CGI look "real" for the most part. The killing effects occur
so quickly that there is little time to react with more than shock.
These sharks are so big they can swallow their prey whole, so the gore
isn't exploited, much.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Deep Blue Sea, he would have paid...
Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š by, Chuck
Schwartz. All Rights Reserved.

Author
Stephen Graham Jones
The Jaws structure works because it's simple: oversized shark enters
isolated community, begins feeding, has a few good kills and chase scenes,
then is in turn chased and killed, largely because the whole meal-thing got
a little too personal somewhere along the way. Man versus nature, intellect
against instinct, all that. Deviate too far and you don't have a shark-movie
anymore. Duncan Kennedy and Wayne Powers were aware of this during writing,
and it shows. Deep Blue Sea is a shark movie, this time set out on a
Waterworld-ish compound, complete even with another anti-social man from
Atlantis, right down to the haircut, sleeveless wetsuit, and underwater
acrobatics: Carter Blake (Thomas Jane) the soon-to-be-redeemed ex-con.
And of course his chums, led by the overworked Samuel Jackson and rounded
out by the beautiful-anywhere Saffron Burrows, playing a female Victor von,
LL Cool J in the mix there somewhere, in another unreprised yet still
entertaining role (see H20). The low point of the movie is everytime his
alcoholic preacher character tries to get metaphysical. The high point is
the sharks: Renny Harlin (Die Hard 2, Cliffhanger, Long Kiss Goodnight )
knows how to put an action sequence together in the computer, and has plenty
of opportunity. Remember the floating cow in Twister? Deep Blue Sea has a
similar moment with the floating leg/twitching foot of a
recently-bitten-in-half crewman. But yes, the structure is Jaws all the way,
what with the waterborne Aquatica compound, the isolating storm, the sharks
fenced in so they can't leave.
Yes, plural sharks. In keeping with Anaconda, Lake Placid, Ghost & the
Darkness (Jaws 3), etc., there's not just one of them anymore. That would be
too easy. And they're makos this time, which have a cooler color scheme
anyway. Needless to say, these sharks are vatgrown, genetically-enhanced,
smart. Pretty much Benchley's Creature without the bothersome legs. We get
the gist of this via some particularly clunky exposition, where Jackson's
Russel Franklin--the cashcow of Aquatica, there to pull the plug unless the
good doctors can convince him otherwise--gets the grand tour.
What perhaps saves Deep Blue Sea from being just another Jaws sequel is the
awareness that this isn't 1975. Not just talking animatronics here, either,
but pop knowledge: we know too much about sharks by now to listen to a
Dreyfuss character wax poetic about feeding habits, rogue behavior, life
cycles, etc. This can all be assumed, and is. In addition, there's enough
environmental guilt circulating that if these sharks weren't essentially
man-made (see: Godzilla) their eventual destruction would be pretty much
unwarranted, (see: King Kong) in spite of the havoc they wreak. What perhaps
doesn't save Deep Blue Sea from being just another Jaws sequel is when it
tries really hard not to be, which is to say when it tries to supplant
Spielberg's underwater POV's we know love and expect with overwater
character history, motivations, revelation, all that small Sphere-type
drama. At least there's no love sub-plot. Just a lot of people getting
ripped apart, which is what we paid to see.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Warner Bros./Village Roadshow Pictures
 Director:  Renny Harlin
 Writer:  Duncan Kennedy, Donna Powers & Wayne Powers
 Cast: Thomas Jane, LL Cool J, Samuel L. Jackson,
Jacqueline McKenzie, Michael Rapaport, Stellan Skarsgard
   They say that the road to hell is paved with good
intentions: "Deep Blue Sea" involves a story line that proves
the point.  Renny Harlin's film focuses on an experiment
conducted at a marine biology base in Baja California three
miles from the Mexican town of Santa Rosita.  A team of
scientists led by the brilliant Dr. Jim Whitlock (Stellan
Skarsgard) seeks a cure for Alzheimer's disease, with Susan
McAlester (Saffron Burrows), a particularly idealistic woman,
thrilled to part in shark research that could finish off the dread
degenerative disease.  But in doing so, McAlester necessarily
creates a Frankenstein monster intent on destroying the very
people who are messing with its life--getting revenge indeed,
as this big fish can actually think and plan on a fairly high
level.  Three sharks have been genetically altered to make
them smart.  The biologists' aim is to draw fluid from their
brains of these 8,000-pound killing machines that could be
synthesized into a drug.  The trouble is that if any of these
sharks should get loose--a distinct possibility given their
dolphin-like brainpower--they could destroy first their creators
and then untold numbers of others they'd happen upon in the
deep blue sea.  This is a Frankenstein story indeed.
   But Renny Harlin, who oversees this shark-o-rama is no
Whale and does not come close to replicating the terror
created in "Jaws" by Steven Spielberg--a classic that
fortunately went light on the special effects.   Nor are writers
Duncan Kennedy, Wayne Powers and Donna Powers, in a
class with Mary Shelley.  With a lame script (think of the cry
of one victim, Janet Winters, who falls into the water: Save
me!  I don't want to die!") and a direction that employs not a
smidgen of originality, what do you have left?  Just
special effects: but in that area, the oversized suchi created
by CGI and animatronic technology look no more authentic
that the fish that Spielberg worked with in 1975.  The
obligatory explosions and torrents of water rushing into the
laboratory threatening to drown everyone who's not already
eaten are as generic as the shark is genetic.
   The story opens on Russell Franklin, who heads a major
pharmaceutical company about to pull the plug on its $200
million investment in Alzheimer's research.  He is talked into
giving the research team forty-eight more hours to convince
him of their achievements and is escorted to the Baja
California site of the experimentation where he is introduced
to the "brilliant" Dr. Jim Whitlock.  "If he's so brilliant," asserts
Franklin, "Why is pissing into the wind?" (Indeed the doctor is
doing just that on top of the deck.  Why?  Probably to get a
laugh out of audience members who haven't seen that silly
gesture a dozen times this year.)  Susan impresses Franklin
by dropping 2 cc. of shark fluid into a bottled brain, noting
how the cells are regenerating successfully, but just as he's
about to report back to his company to authorize the
investment, all hell breaks loose in Baja.  If this is not your
first summer horror movie, you know the rest.
   The cast wastes the extraordinary talent of Stellan
Skarsgard in what's easily his silliest role (Skarsgard is
perhaps most familiar to an American audience from his
appearance in "Ronin" but the Swedish actor's great role
teamed him with the great Emily Watson in Lars von Trier's
"Breaking the Waves").  Samuel L. Jackson looks
appropriately professorial with goatee and glasses, and while
his role is likewise shallow, he performs a great service for
the pharmaceutical industry, which constantly needs to justify
the outlandish prices that Americans pay for prescription
drugs.  LL Cool J is the audience sentimental favorite as
Dudley, a parrot-loving cook on the lab site, who wonders
why the "brothers" don't leave dangerous assignments to "the
white folks."  This is a summer movie, granted, but it's hot
out there: we deserve better.
  Hey: If these genetically-altered sharks are do darn smart, what 
are they doing in this film?

Author
Scott Renshaw
DEEP BLUE SEA
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Saffron Burrows, Thomas Jane, LL Cool J, Samuel L. Jackson,
Jacqueline McKenzie, Michael Rapaport, Stellan Skarsgaard.
Screenplay:  Duncan Kennedy and Donna Powers & Wayne Powers.
Producers:  Akiva Goldsman, Tony Ludwig and Alan Riche.
Director:  Renny Harlin.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Steven Spielberg has said for years that one of the keys to the
success of JAWS was technical failure.  The mechanical shark
affectionately nicknamed "Bruce" wasn't necessarily supposed to be a
shadowy figure menacing the protagonists from the fringes of the frame --
he just didn't work right.  Bruce's frequent unannounced work stoppages
forced Spielberg to get more creative.  The rest is a milestone in
cinematic suspense history, further proof that real terror comes not from
what we see, but from what we're afraid we're going to see.
     It would be easy enough to scoff at DEEP BLUE SEA as a gloss on JAWS
that just doesn't "get it," but that wouldn't be entirely fair.  JAWS,
whether intentionally or made necessary by technical limitations, was a
suspense film; DEEP BLUE SEA is an old-fashioned monster movie.  The
killer predators here are experimental subjects in a floating research
facility off the coast of Baja California, enhanced by Dr. Susan McAlester
(Saffron Burrows) to promote her research into a shark-based cure for
degenerative brain disease.  An unfortunate side effect of her research is
that the brains of her test sharks are now large enough to permit higher
cognitive functions, inspiring such fishy thoughts as "I guess it's about
time to destroy the facility and kill all the humans."
     Thus begins a person-by-person chomp-fest through a cast that
includes (not necessarily in order of consumption) Samuel L. Jackson (as a
pharmaceutical company bigwig), Thomas Jane (as a shark diver with a
checkered past), LL Cool J (as a religiously devout chef), Michael
Rapaport (as the chief engineer) and Stellan Skarsgaard (as a vaguely
eccentric research scientist).  The genre conventions are all terribly
conventional, but director Renny Harlin stages them with methodical
effectiveness.  There are a few solid scares and one magnificently
effective shock, the kind that leaves an audience giggling nervously for
several seconds.  There's even some cautionary nonsense about scientific
hubris, in the fine tradition of FRANKENSTEIN or THE FLY.  It's what
monster movies are supposed to do, and DEEP BLUE SEA uses its trio of
toothy villains to deliver the requisite armrest-gripping.
     If only anyone involved with the script had taken a second to go
beyond the merely requisite.  DEEP BLUE SEA is full of half-completed
characters doing generally stupid things.  Granted, the monster movie as
we know it would not exist without people doing generally stupid things,
but it's still frustrating to put up with them saying stupid things at the
same time.  The film gets even sloppier by positing not merely that the
sharks have developed advanced intelligence, but that they have apparently
studied physics and engineering, and had access to detailed schematic
diagrams of the facility.  There's only so far a film can involve you when
it treats the viewers as though they're dumb and treats the characters as
though they're chum.
     DEEP BLUE SEA is, of course, following in some mighty big footsteps
in the killer shark milieu, which makes it even more surprising that there
are so many echoes of JAWS and its sequels.  The opening sequence involves
a night attack on some frivolous teenagers; one shark is dispatched with a
bite on an electric cable (JAWS 2); another ends up raining down in
bite-sized chunks.  It's almost as though Harlin and company _want_ the
film to be compared to JAWS, as though they think they've one-upped the
ultimate shark film.  In the press notes, Harlin says of JAWS, "It's 25
years later, and audiences, accustomed to animatronics and
computer-generated imagery, need to see more."  And perhaps he's right,
but that still only makes DEEP BLUE SEA a technically-proficient monster
movie.  As character-driven suspense, it bites off much more than it can
chew.

Author
Steve Rhodes
DEEP BLUE SEA is a movie about intelligence and the lack thereof.
On the intelligent side are 3 jumbo-sized, killer sharks. Through
genetic engineering they have had their brains dramatically enlarged.
This causes them to be super-smart killing machines. Don't worry, this
is all for a noble purpose, the eradication of Alzheimer's Disease. (I'm
not making this up.)
On the unintelligent side is just about everyone else. The characters in
the story make one stupid decision after another, as if they were trying
hard to fail the ultimate pop quiz.
When trapped several stories underground in a platform at sea, for
example, the people in the movie just stare as a shark slowly breaks the
plate glass in front of them. Only when a river of water knocks them
over do they begin to beat a hasty retreat.
A question should also be raised about the sanity of the film's backers.
Director Renny Harlin has become known, of late, for his overbudget,
lavish fiascoes that bomb at the box office. When he first pitched the
movie, he should have been turned down flat. A disaster movie set in the
ocean, in which we watch sharks slowly eat most of the cast, isn't
exactly original or interesting. And the script by Duncan Kennedy, Wayne
Powers and Donna Powers is completely ridiculous.
The movie wastes the first half-hour slowly introducing us to the
players. (If you get the urge to walk out during this dead period, do
not resist.)
Saffron Burrows plays Dr. Susan McAlester, who is perfectly willing to
sacrifice everyone in the name of science -- her father had Alzheimer's,
you see. As Carter Blake, Thomas Jane is the diver who's never found any
action too risky. Samuel L. Jackson plays the project's financial
backer, Russell Franklin, a mountain climber who recently survived an
avalanche. There are many others. The filmmakers need plenty of shark
food. Finally, the only cast member to insert any humanity into the
picture is LL Cool J as the religious, cross-carrying cook.
Played seriously, the movie is no parody, although it becomes so
ludicrous that you will laugh, and loudly, on occasion. But this
laughter is that of pain as you realize what an awful movie the studios
are subjecting you to. Castor oil would taste good in comparison. The
film is definitely worst of the year material. On the other hand, if
they start giving awards for actors who manage to keep a straight face
during a ridiculous farce, every member of this cast would be
contenders, save LL Cool J, who seems to understand how noisome it is.
"It's pretty scary stuff, huh?" scientist Janet Winters (Jacqueline
McKenzie) asks Franklin about the sharks. "Yeah, it is," he agrees. The
problem in the movie is that no matter how many people are bitten in
two, it's never the least bit scary because it's never credible. Fear
comes only when you can believe what you see. Nothing in DEEP BLUE SEA
is the least bit believable.
The list of nonsensical events in the movie is endless. As another
example, they call their local flying doctor service in the middle of a
hurricane. With gale force winds and seas in excess of thirty feet, the
helicopter comes anyway and chooses to fly close to the water. Through a
miracle of miracles, the helicopter crew attaches the injured to a
cable, which goes a few feet above the shark tank. Now, is there anyone
who can't guess the success of the helicopter's mission?
Is there any scene worth saving in the movie? Yes, the film contains,
hands-down, the best anti-smoking commercial imaginable.
DEEP BLUE SEA runs way too long at 1:45. It is rated R for graphic shark
attacks and for language. The movie would be acceptable for teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Jamey Hughton
Director Renny Harlin hit somewhat of a rough patch in 1995, when his
pirate adventure Cutthroat Island become one of the biggest bombs of all
time. Then in 1996 came The Long Kiss Goodnight, which also
under-performed at the box office. And so, scarred by past failures and
hoping to revive his ailing career, Harlin has returned to his action
roots to deliver the underwater creature feature Deep Blue Sea.
Sharks are known for being efficient killing machines, but are never
praised for their intelligence. Deep Blue Sea gives us an excuse to
increase their IQ, introducing a group of scientists who have enlarged
the brain tissue of three mako sharks five-fold with a hope to find a
cure for Alzheimers. The experiment has commenced on Aquatica, a oceanic
research lab resembling that of a `floating Alcatraz'. Dr. Susan
McAlester (Saffron Burrows) is heading the project, along with her
assistant (Jacqueline McKenzie) and a brilliant scientist (Stellan
Skarsgard). Together, they are on the verge of a medical breakthrough.
But not everything goes to plan. There have been problems, including an
escaped mako causing havoc for a group of teenagers out on at a nightly
cruise (depicted in the distinctly Spielbergian opening scene). And
experienced shark wrangler Carter Blake (Thomas Jane) has been noticing
some surprising intellectual advances in the sharks. Namely: they can
recognize a weapon, they can swim backwards, etc. Basically, whereas a
regular mako would be thinking `Food! Food! Food!', these fishies are
deeply contemplating things like `Oh, that fellow looks somewhat chubby
for my taste... I'll have to choose another entree.'
The financial backer of the Alzheimers project, a tight-wad businessman
named Russell Franklin (Samuel L. Jackson), arrives on Aquatica to
survey the goings-on. And what timing! It is during a regular test that
everything goes awry. An arm gets gnawed off, a helicopter crashes into
the lab, all (of course) with a deadly storm brewing above. The small
group of survivors, also including the religiously fanatical chef (LL
Cool J) and the nervous engineer (Michael Rapaport), are stranded inside
with a deadly trio of toothy villains. What follows is a lot of
screaming, dismembered bodies and frantic swimming from very large
dorsal fins scanning the many hallways.
Deep Blue Sea has shadows of fun. Once we get past the familiar set-up
and the main players are introduced, we're treated to an exciting
disaster sequence involving a lot of flames and slow-motion running. The
eerie atmosphere, captured nicely throughout, sets in with a chill. But
when the reality of poor writing and cheesy special effects sets in,
this promising film becomes a perpetual disappointment. The characters
flee like extras from The Poseidon Adventure, and the script becomes so
ridiculous it often borders on self-parody.
There are a couple of moments that will make you jump - one, in
particular - but still Deep Blue Sea fails miserably as a claustrophobic
horror movie. The shark attacks are a resoundingly fake and almost
cartoonish use of computer generated imagery. The actors become rag
dolls viciously torn apart by these creatures, and the finished product
is seriously lacking in shock value. Why? Because we know, all too well,
that they are merely special effects. I only wish the excellent
animatronic sharks were relied upon more often, and these laughable
visuals could be extracted to avoid unintentional amusement.
The film's greatest asset is LL Cool J. The rapper has already tried his
hand at acting (he appeared in Halloween H2O), but his performance here
is funny and bright. Of the remaining actors, Jackson fares the best,
with his veteran authority and dignified presence adding a thankful
extra dimension. Little-known independent actor Jane could emerge a
star, while Burrows - well, her work here is superior to that of Wing
Commander. One refreshing thing about Deep Blue Sea is the fact that the
supporting cast is made up of familiar faces, and there is never a
certainty as to who is going to become dinner.
The silly script relies too much on special effects and not enough on
plot. The intelligence of the sharks is discarded in favor of the
scares, and we get little description of their super-smart antics. The
dialogue is obvious, the foundation is always creaky, and the Trevor
Rabin musical soundtrack is simply appalling. I could have concocted a
better score with kitchen utensils and tin pans. You may have fun at
Deep Blue Sea - the action is well-staged, and the pace never slows. But
you could be easily distracted by the cornball script and special
effects, which is why I advise you not to tread in these waters.
MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton:  http://welcome.to/movieviews
......................

Author
Bob Bloom
 I have a confession: Deep down in my darkest soul, I'm a sadist. I enjoy
watching people get killed in gruesome ways in movies. It sort of helps to
let out all the pent-up aggression.
 Therefore, for those of you who think along the same lines, "The Deep Blue
Sea" is your kind of movie.
 Nothing is as satisfying as seeing human beings transformed by sharks into
sushi.
 Too bad, though, that, there's so little of human vs. shark interaction in
the movie. At one hour and 45 minutes, about 90 minutes is filled with
humans interacting with other humans. And that is too bad.
 For when the sharks are away, the people are bores. Actually, they are not
even people - merely types: the dedicated scientist who, by breaking
protocols in the name of humanity and research, creates smart sharks that
can outthink the humans; the outsider, loner adventurer who is the only
reach match for the sharks; the black cook who has rediscovered religion;
and the industrialist who only cares about his publicity and the bottom
line.
 You really don't give a hoot about any of these people. They are merely
shark bait. And you merely sit and watch, waiting for the next person to be
bit in half by the trio of man-eating denizens at a high-tech research
facility in the middle of the ocean.
 Even the computer-generated effects are second rate. When the sharks speed
up or take a nibble on one of the performers, the screen becomes a bit
blurry and the action looks like something off a computer game.
 All in all, "The Deep Blue Sea," directed by Renny Harlin, is a grade-C
movie that should be running at the drive-in on a double bill with "Lake
Placid."
 Between killer sharks and killer 'gators, it is not nice to mess with
Mother Nature this summer.
 Nope, "The Deep Blue Sea" is a big watery bore. You can find more fun and
excitement at a water park than on the screen.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Kent Johnson
Tagline:  "You'll believe a shark can suck."
DEEP BLUE SEA is a monster movie about sharks whose brain size and
intelligence are accidentally quintupled by genetic experiments (by
those darn do-gooder scientists who just won't leave well enough alone)
terrorizing an ocean research facility.
The film has great visuals, great underwater photography, great sets,
reasonably convincing animatronic sharks, a good soundtrack, and a lead
actress (Saffron Burrows) with a gorgeous face and a deliciously throaty
British accent.  The filming must have must physically grueling for the
actors and enough money seems to have been spent to support a small
country for a year (not to mention enough water to irrigate all their
crops).
Unfortunately, all of this is in support of an incredibly stupid story.
First there are the standard Hollywood flaws:  The plot is completely
lacking in logic, the characters have no depth and behave stupidly in
order to provide suspense and, the most disappointing for a movie about
smart sharks, the sharks are mere plot devices rather than characters,
possessed of incredible speed, unlikely physical abilities and
supernatural knowledge when convenient to generate suspense, mayhem and
gotchas, but suddenly lacking all these qualities when they're
inconvenient for the characters' survival.
On top of this, the film has several features that push it over into the
"actively offensive" category:
1)  An annoying, heavy-handed and insincere Christian subtext, seemingly
designed to deflect censorship groups who might otherwise protest the
film's violence.
2)  A heavy-handed and insincere pro-black stance.
3)  A heavy-handed anti-genetics-research message.
4)  And, in keeping with its appease-the-censorship-groups policy, a
near-complete lack of the female body.  (A difficult feat for a film
with beautiful women and this much water -- normally the province of
bikinis, wet t-shirts and form-fitting scuba suits.  In fact we see very
little of the actresses other than their faces.)
The film seems to have been custom-designed for censorship groups with
the intelligence of the average shark.  I hope they enjoy it , since no
one else will.
Not worth renting on video either, since the visuals are the film's only
virtue and won't be that impressive on the small screen.

Author
Brian Matherly
Cast: Samuel L. Jackson, Saffron Burrows, Thomas Jane, Stellan Skarsgard, LL 
Cool J, Michael Rapaport
Written by: Duncan Kennedy, Wayne Powers and Donna Powers
Directed by: Renny Harlin
Running Time: 105 minutes
Date Reviewed: July 31, 1999
The second movie to come down the pike this year involving killer animals 
(the other being Lake Placid), Deep Blue Sea is definitely better than the 
other film but still seems flawed.  When a research shark escapes from an 
offshore lab built inside an old German submarine base and attacks a boat, 
the corporation funding the shark project threatens to shut the scientist's 
lab down due to negative press.  It turns out that the sharks are being 
harvested to help combat Alzheimer's Disease, and one of the head scientists 
(Saffron Burrows) makes a desperate plea to let the research continue.  She 
is given the weekend to show results, and a liaison (played by Samuel L. 
Jackson) is sent along with her to report the findings.  What he finds are 
sharks with genetically enhanced intelligence and a terrible storm that 
seals off the scientists in the lab with the rampaging creatures.
I wish every scene in this movie could have been as cool as the scene where 
the shark propels the guy in the stretcher into the front glass of the lab, 
smashing the glass and flooding the room.  Unfortunately, the movie ceases 
to become inventive after that.  Sure there are a couple of plot twists that 
one doesn't see coming, but overall the film seems to be contrived. Scream 2 
already brought up the point that African American cast members always seem 
to die early on in horror films, so do we really need to hear the same 
sentiment echoed by LL Cool J midway through this film?
Renny Harlin's direction is okay during the action scenes, but the editing 
of some of the comedic moments is poor.  I'm not sure I would have laughed 
had they been edited better, but as they stand some of the jokes come off as 
awkward and stilted.  We are supposed to find comic relief in LL Cool J's 
relationship with his insult spouting
parrot, but one finds the parrot's demise in the maws of a shark funnier 
than any scene the parrot appears alive in.
Most of the film's filler cast is given the standard "I'm gonna die soon, so 
don't get too attached to me" characterization, so there's really no one to 
care about in the film.  A relationship that forms between Burrows and her 
swarthy handyman/head diver/shark wrangler rings false, and Samuel L. 
Jackson's role (which I'm assuming was
designed to be the "unknowledgeable new guy" character through which we, the 
audience, learn all the exposition) is relegated to being in awe of 
everything going on around him.
Thankfully, there is one redeeming scene (for me, anyway) where Burrows must 
remove her wet suit and use it to stand on, in her underwear, so she can 
avoid the electrical surge she is about to cause by throwing a live wire 
into the water in front of an advancing shark in order to kill it.  Too bad 
there were no scenes involving the use of jet skis in the water flooded 
hallways of the undersea lab though.  That's another sure-fire way to get on 
my good side.  [R]
Brian Matherly -- bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted 
without permission.


Author
Walter Frith
Director Renny Harlin had two films out in 1990.  One of them was a
disastrous film entitled 'The Adventures of Ford Fairlane' and the other
was 'Die Hard 2', a worthy sequel to 1988's 'Die Hard'.  Harlin can look
so good at times and so lousy at others.  He's one of the directors that
frequents the big screen in schizophrenic style.  His latest film, 'Deep
Blue Sea', is somewhere in the middle between good and bad.  It's sort
of the purgatory of film making if you will.  
On the plus side, there are no slow spots but on the negative side,
there are too many references to other films such as 'Jaws', 'The Abyss'
and 'The Poseidon Adventure'.  There are also some pretty lousy special
effects that look similar to the snake in 1997's 'Anaconda' which was
cheesy and the computer crop marks around the enhanced snake looked very
visible.  In the case of 'Deep Blue Sea', they don't look quite as bad
but they don't look all that convincing either.
Dr. Susan McAlester (Saffron Burrows) and Dr. Jim Whitlock (Stellan
Skarsgĺrd) believe they may have found a protein like substance in a
shark's brain that could lead to a major breakthrough in the cure for
Alzheimer's disease.  Funding the project is Russ Franklin (Samuel L.
Jackson).  As he and all the other major members of the cast are
assembled, things go awry.  There is the engineer Tom Scoggins (Michael
Rapaport), another scientist Janet Winters (Jacqueline McKenzie), the
shark handler Carter Blake (Thomas Jane) and a chef (LL Cool J).  The
entire project is on a station in the Pacific Ocean and battling the
elements of a fierce storm and the rebelling sharks who don't like being
experimented on are just some of the problems that arise causing
everyone's life to be put in jeopardy.  The sharks also have an
extremely fast thinking process, an intelligence similar to a human
being's that gives them the edge over us when you compare their strength
and size to it all.
'Deep Blue Sea' is one of those pictures where the action concocted is
at times mediocre at best.  Mediocre because it lacks the injection of
the little things that make an action picture work --- the detailed
elements of things like humour from time to time, the ability to stop
and take a breath and the intelligent stroke of trying to avoid a
formula presentation which is a trap that many films seem to fall into,
thinking that the audience hasn't seen it all before.  
The screenplay of 'Deep Blue Sea' is by Duncan Kennedy, Wayne Powers and
Donna Powers and has the elements of obligation rather than
imagination.  By that, I mean that it looks like they had a deadline to
meet rather than by treating writing as the personal obligation that it
is where no deadlines mean that the best work will be accomplished.
To make a movie about sharks is almost a waste since inevitable
comparisons to 'Jaws' are sure to follow.  After 'Jaws' we had
'Piranha', 'Orca', 'Alligator' and, yes, even 'Tentacles' about a giant
octopus.  It seems that almost twenty five years later, we still have
the large predatory creature films that look less and less like
entertainment and more and more like someone is obsessed with advancing
computer technology at the expense of a paying audience.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
David Sunga
Written by: Duncan Kennedy, Donna Powers and Wayne Powers
Starring: Saffron Burrows, Thomas Jane, Samuel L. Jackson, LL Cool J,
Michael Rapaport
Synopsis: 
In a floating research facility called Aquatica, proteins are harvested
from the brains of three mako sharks as part of research on a cure for
Alzheimer's disease. Mako sharks, a species where the female is much larger
than the male, are some of the fastest, highest leaping fish in the world,
as well as possibly the most the most intelligent type of shark and a
leader in attacks on boats. An unfortunate consequence of the Aquatica
research is that it enhances the size, invulnerability, and intelligence of
the three sharks. The humans seem firmly in control, but when an accident
happens, guess who's got the upper hand?
Opinion:
Who will survive? The beautiful but ice-cold lady scientist, the reformed
convict? The depressed research assistant or her smokaholic boyfriend, the
baby-faced engineer, the rich financier, or the cook? DEEP BLUE SEA is no
cliches and all surprises. It'll put you on the edge of your seat more
times than the original Jurassic Park. DEEP BLUE SEA was the funnest movie
I've seen all summer, and I highly recommend it for an outing of scary fun
and entertainment. 
Copyright Š 1999 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Renny Harlin.
Cast: Saffron Burrows, Thomas Jane, LL Cool J, Samuel L. Jackson, Michael 
Rapaport, Jacqueline McKenzie, Stellan Skarsgard, Aida Turturro.
1999 - 105 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, profanity, and gore).
Reviewed July 29, 1999. 
Despite its "sharky" villains, "Deep Blue Sea" is more akin to the "Alien" 
series than to "Jaws," which signals that the film honestly is cliche-ridden 
and unoriginal, but it nonetheless is one of the more exciting additions to 
the genre, thanks to director Renny Harlin's talent for creating slam-bang 
action sequences. Flawed as much of the film may be, it is one of the few 
big-budget summer extravaganzas this year (unlike "The Haunting" and "Lake 
Placid") that actually delivers on its promise to put you on the edge of your 
seat, and is also rather unpredictable concerning who the survivors, and the 
lunch, will turn out to be by story's end.
Following the inevitable prologue in which two young couples on a small boat 
are attacked, the film wastes no time in introducing Dr. Susan McAlester 
(Saffron Burrows), a marine biologist, who convinces her corporate funder, 
Russell Franklin (Samuel L. Jackson), to come back with her to her research 
lab on a former U.S. Navy sub base, to prove that she has found a potential 
cure for Alzheimer's disease, involving three 45-foot test sharks that move 
at an alarmingly swift pace and who are unusually smart. With most of the 
staff leaving for the weekend, Susan, Russell, and six additional workers, 
including co-creator Carter Blake (Thomas Jane); engineer Tom Scoggins 
(Michael Rapaport); chef Preacher (LL Cool J); and assistants Janice Higgins 
(Jacqueline McKenzie) and Jim Whitlock (Stellan Skarsgard), are left alone. 
When a violent storm arises and, through a series of circumstances, the base 
is severely damaged and partially flooded, the three sharks swim on-board to 
terrorize the inhabitants, all of which are underground with very little 
means of being able to reach the surface.
The plot of "Deep Blue Sea" certainly isn't going to win any award for 
inventiveness, as the same basic premise and set-up has been remade too many 
times to count, but luckily, Harlin revs the film up surprisingly quickly 
after all of the characters are introduced, and afterwards, is so relentless 
on its action scenes that you rarely get time to take a breather. And just 
when you think you can, there will be a startling jolt to put you right back 
on the edge. 
Since there really isn't anything new to be done with this type of movie, and 
thus, they almost always end up being a bore (see 1998's "Deep Rising" and 
1999's "Virus"), "Deep Blue Sea" demonstrates that any film's success depends 
solely on its treatment and expertise, which Harlin has always been known 
for. In an attempt to compel and arouse the viewer, Harlin does not skimp in 
any way on energy, nor could he ever be accused of making a "boring" film 
(unless, of course, it's name happens to be "Cutthroat Island"). Once the 
storm hits, the first victim is dispatched in an elongated, grisly manner, 
and the ball gets rolling approximately thirty minutes in, the movie doesn't 
let up, with a big action setpiece arriving every few minutes. Most directors 
would simply present a "death" scene, juice it up with middling suspense, and 
then move on to the next scene, but with Harlin, he always seems to take the 
action, and intensity, one step further (as in 1993's "Cliffhanger" and 
1996's "The Long Kiss Goodnight") so as to amaze and entertain with his 
particular creativity. 
One other compliment that must be made is that, more than any horror-style 
picture of its type in awhile, the proceedings are often unpredictable when 
dealing with who the victims will be. Usually you can tell, with the 
top-billed actors living, and the lesser-known supporting players being 
offed, but this tried-and-true formula is promptly crumpled up and thrown 
away as one of the "main" characters is unexpectedly torn to shreds midway 
through. Once this vital moment occurs, you realize no character is safe, 
similar to the now-infamous Drew Barrymore opener in 1996's "Scream."
Dodging the utter corniness of the derivative "The Haunting," "Deep Blue 
Sea," like all of its similar predecessors, still remains weak on the 
screenplay level. Written by Akiva Goldsman (who destroyed the "Batman" 
series with 1997's horrendous "Batman and Robin"), the film leaves something 
to be desired when reminiscing back on the dialogue and one-note characters. 
Despite being played straight most of the time, Goldsman foolishly feels the 
need to sprinkle one-liners here and there, every single one of which falls 
as flat as a pancake. The characters aren't much better (actually they're 
worse). In the course of the film, you are lucky to learn much of anything 
about the humans, as they are mostly there as pawns in a far bigger chess 
game and are given very little time to develop substantially satisfying 
individual personalities. The actors do what they can, however, and are 
mostly so believable that it would be rather easy to overlook the needlessly 
underwritten characters. Of them all, LL Cool J is given the most time to 
really shine (and is also the most likable), while Saffron Burrows and 
relative newcomer Thomas Jane act as the heroine and hero, respectively. Also 
of notice is Jacquelyn McKenzine, an obvious character actress (just watch 
her heartwrenching turn in 1997's Australian drama, "Angel Baby"), who is 
highly empathetic and given the most effective scene, not to mention a 
supreme example of raw terror (only surpassed this year by "The Blair Witch 
Project"). Unfortunately, it is the most seasoned pro, Samuel L. Jackson, 
that doesn't seem to be in his usual top form, but that probably has 
something to do with his poorly-written role. As for the sharks, the 
mechanical ones are more plausible than the CGI ones, but aren't as 
awe-inspiring on a visual level. Both types, however, achieve satisfactory 
villain status.
All in all, "Deep Blue Sea" is neither deep nor meaningful. It knows it is a 
popcorn movie, pure and simple, but unlike most of them that leave you 
feeling even more hungry than when you first sat down to watch the film, this 
movie, indeed, gives you the much-needed bang for your buck. Go in expecting 
a masterpiece of modern cinema, and you are surely setting yourself up for a 
disappointment. But go in expecting to be genuinely entertained, and you'll 
have yourself a rollicking time. Besides, what was the last high-profile 
summer action movie that even succeeded on this most elementary level? 
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Author
John Beachem
Contrary to what the previews might have you believe, "Deep Blue Sea" is not a
film about smart sharks. I don't personally believe the sharks involved were
particularly intelligent. The movie is actually about stupid people. For
example, in one scene, our supposedly brilliant scientists are trapped in their
cozy little underwater lab while a shark smashes the large window they're all
staring through. The window cracks all over the place, water starts leaking
through, and still the group continues to stare. Finally, it shatters
completely, and only Samuel L. Jackson's character has the brains to tell
everyone to run. I truly believe that if he hadn't said anything, they all
would have been washed out into the sea, still staring blankly ahead. This is
simply one of the more idiotic scenes in an incredibly stupid movie.
Dr. Susan McAlester (Saffron Burrows) is a driven scientist who is obsessed
with finding the cure for Alzheimer's. The problem is, she's not showing any
results, and her funding is about to be cut. So she drags her benefactor,
Russell Franklin (Samuel L. Jackson), out to her little floating laboratory to
show him all that she has accomplished. Her crew consists of a shark expert
(Thomas Jane), a cook (L. L. Cool J), two scientists (Jacqueline McKenzie,
Stellan Skarsgard), and the brainy, though irritating, computer expert (Michael
Rapaport). I think there were a few others, but it's obvious from the start
that they're going to be shark food. The sharks at this lab are apparently
smarter than the average bear, and as a result they are able to break free of
their cages and wreak havoc. True to disaster movie formula, there is a massive
hurricane at this time (darn the luck). The valiant (though still incredibly
stupid) crew tries to make it to the surface before the sharks make meals of
them.
Before I go any further, I must confess to being afflicted by a massive fear of
sharks. I remember reading about carpet sharks when I was a little kid, and how
they hid in the sand, just waiting for some unsuspecting sap to swim nearby so
they could have a snack. Anyway, that fear has haunted me to this day, and
"Deep Blue Sea" still didn't scare me in the slightest. In this modern age,
with its huge advances in computer technology, you'd think they could have made
these sharks look mildly realistic. I'm afraid not folks. These look like
something out of an old '50s movie, like "The Lost World" (the original, not
the equally horrible '97 version). So I sat there, watching these stupid people
being chased by incredibly fake looking sharks, and all that I could think was,
please let either the sharks or the people die, so this torture will end.
How this pitiful excuse for a script managed to attract an actor of Samuel
Jackson's caliber will forever be a mystery to me. All I can figure, is he was
either simply bored out of his mind, or the producers drove up to his house
with a truck full of money (which would explain why they couldn't afford decent
special effects). With the exception of LL Cool J, the remaining actors are
unimpressive, even in roles which require them to do nothing more than run
around screaming. As for poor LL Cool J, he somehow manages to spark some life
into his role as the  hassled and underappreciated cook. The truth is, I really
feel sorry for LL Cool J. The man is not an untalented actor, yet he is handed
nothing but rotten scripts ("Toys", "Any Given Sunday"). I believe he could do
something with a good, comic script.
I don't know if I can even recommend this film to fans of cheesy "b" horror
movies, because it's not at all scary. However, I would recommend it to those
of you who want to see how not to use digital technology. I suppose there are a
few humorous scenes (though I can't seem to remember what they were), and
several unintentionally hilarious ones (the massive sharks fitting through tiny
little doors is a good example). "Deep Blue Sea" runs an excruciatingly long
104 minutes, during which you'll either fall asleep, or be too awe struck at
the stupidity of this film to do so. Stay far, far away from this one or
studios might think there is money to be made in creating more films like it. I
grant it a sadly generous one and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Author
Shay Casey
Year: 1999.
Starring Saffron Burrows, Samuel L. Jackson, Thomas Jane, LL Cool J, Michael
Rapaport, Jacqueline McKenzie, Stellan Skarsgĺrd.
Written by Duncan Kennedy, Wayne Powers, and Donna Powers.
Directed by Renny Harlin.
Rated R.
"Jaws" it ain't. It may have fearsome sharks chasing some humans around and
certain scenes may bear some relation to scenes from the Spielberg classic,
but "Deep Blue Sea" has neither the interesting characters nor the
engrossing story of that film. It is, however, a pretty good summer flick
that will keep you munching on your popcorn while it serves up everything a
summer monster movie should. It's fun, thrilling, and totally unpredictable.
In the end, unpredictability is what saves "Deep Blue Sea" from being a dull
action movie and turns it into a decently entertaining thriller, one that
will keep the audience on their toes.
Saffron Burrows plays Dr. Susan McAllister, a scientist studying sharks'
brains in an attempt to find the cure for Alzheimer's Disease. After a shark
escapes and assaults a boat full of teenagers, corporate honcho Russell
Franklin (Samuel L. Jackson) gives her one last chance to prove the value of
her work before her funding is pulled. She takes him out to the site, a huge
underwater facility called Aquatica, so he can observe what happens there.
After most of the crew leaves for the weekend, a skeleton crew is left
behind, including shark hunter Carter Blake (Thomas Jane), computer expert
Tom Scoggins (Michael Rapaport), scientist couple Janice Higgins (Jacqueline
McKenzie) and Jim Whitlock (Stellan Skarsgĺrd), and Preach (LL Cool J), the
religious cook. The sharks begin to exhibit signs of intelligence and, when
a freak storm hits the facility, they take over, flooding entire sections of
Aquatica and trying to eat the humans. It is eventually revealed that
McAllister has violated ethical principles of science and increased the
sharks' brain mass, making them smarter. The trapped humans must now try to
outrun the sharks as well as outsmart them, while trying to figure out how
to reach the surface.
"Deep Blue Sea" contains all the problems that most action films suffer
from. First of all, the dialogue is trite, pathetic, and unconvincing. The
plot also makes very little sense. The biggest problem is, of course, that
Burrows' supposedly "brilliant" scientist hadn't figured out ahead of time
that increasing the sharks' brain mass might make them a little smarter. The
other big problem with the film's premise is that the simple fact that the
sharks are now super-intelligent does not mean that they have seen full
schematics of the facility, or that they know what materials were used to
build it. "Deep Blue Sea" seems to make that assumption when explaining what
the sharks are trying to accomplish. Furthermore, the characters are not
terribly interesting, nor (with the exception of LL Cool J's Preach) are
they terribly charismatic characters. Burrows is an irresponsible jerk,
Jackson is pompous and self-satisfied, and the rest merely fill out the rest
of the necessary stereotypes. All of these problems contribute to a
dragged-out, boring, and infuriating first act, in which we are introduced
in plodding fashion to these uninteresting characters who speak ridiculous
dialogue. During these first 45 minutes or so, this critic was getting all
geared up to proclaim "Deep Blue Sea" as the worst movie of 1999.
Then something happened. I won't give it away (that would be a crime), but
director Renny Harlin sees fit to give us a death that happens so
unexpectedly, at such a surprising time, and to such an unlikely victim,
that I was forced to applaud for how the film had shocked me so
successfully. The film manages to do many things with this one death. Not
only does it kill one of its characters, but it sets up the idea that
absolutely no one will be spared on the basis of race, creed, or box-office
drawing ability. Let's face it, in most films of this nature, it's
relatively easy to determine not only who will die, but also the order in
which the murders will happen. In "Deep Blue Sea," this cannot be done.
Harlin may be a hack, ripping off of "Jaws" and "Jaws 2" (though that may be
considered as more of a tribute), but he at least knows how to surprise an
audience and leave them shrieking with delight after the shocking scene is
over with. The film has no obvious set-up for a death, with slowly rising
music and many obvious shots of the approaching monster. In "Deep Blue Sea,"
the characters are sitting around during a supposed lull in the action, when
suddenly, just when the audience least expects it, CHOMP! The shark has
struck, it's all over, and the audience is struggling to catch its breath.
In this age of overused special effects and directors with horrible shot
selection, this film actually comes as a refreshing bit of fun, a tribute to
B-movie scares that relied more on filmmaking savvy rather than fancy CGI
effects.
Not that the effects in "Deep Blue Sea" aren't convincing. The mixture of
real, animatronic, and computer-generated sharks make for an impressive
package indeed, but it's not the number of effects Harlin uses, it's how he
uses them. Like Spielberg did in "Jaws," Harlin makes sure that, when
building a proper suspense sequence, we don't get to see the shark until
absolutely necessary. Until then, an ominous underwater shadow followed by
an approaching fin cutting through the surface is all we need. He also plays
on monster movie conventions, especially the one that demands that black
characters are not permitted to act intelligently, and that one of them must
be killed first. In one of the film's better jokes, LL Cool J remarks, "I'm
toast. Brothers never make it out of situations like this." His character is
by far the most interesting, since he starts off like a typical ethnic
Hollywood stereotype, that of the bumbling black service employee. Why, they
even made him a religious man. Cool J, however, is able to transcend such
convention and morph, rather suddenly, into a suave action hero, and the
transformation is a welcome change.
So, "Deep Blue Sea" is an effects-driven monster movie that starts off
lousy, but after one very surprising turn of events, becomes an effective
thriller. Don't get me wrong. All the things that were wrong with the first
act apply to the rest of the movie. The dialogue doesn't get any better, the
plot still has major holes in it, and any character not played by a famous
rapper remains a flimsy sketch of a person. If those are the sort of things
that bother you, then you'll probably want to skip "Deep Blue Sea." If you'
re willing to look past those shortcomings and just want to have a good time
at the movies this summer, then this one will fit the bill. I'm giving "Deep
Blue Sea" a recommendation because I was entertained despite the B-movie
quality of the screenplay, and because the picture has one thing going for
it: The element of surprise. That element will keep audiences on their toes
as they engage in a futile effort to predict what will happen next. Any
movie that can do that is a success in my book.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Author
John Sylva
http://hometown.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe/MoviePED.html
Deep Blue Sea is this summer's second monster in the water film, (The first was
the mediocre Lake Placid) and it is trying so hard to be a summer blockbuster,
it makes me cringe.  Making a high budget film with loads of special effects
and well known actors is the formula used to make Deep Blue Sea, but if
screenplay writers Wayne Powers and Duncan Kennedy actually focused on writing
a good movie, I would have to say that is the biggest lie I've ever heard. 
Hollywood frustrates me at times, make that many times, as they have the
potential to make wonderful, spellbinding movies, but instead decide to make
100s of films relying on hype, special effects, and action to make them good. 
Deep Blue Sea is supposed to give you thrills and chills, but instead is a
disappointing film that people will be lashing out those dollar bills for. 
With today's technology, and the actors that have the capability of acting
well, Deep Blue Sea should have been an extremely thrilling, intense, fun
summer film.  If that's what you want from Deep Blue Sea, you will marginally
satisfied. Go see The Blair Witch Project, a classic film that doesn't use any
special effects, or any gore, and features 100 times the chills.
Deep Blue Sea takes place in Baja, California, at the world's most advanced
research center, where Dr. Susan McAlester (Saffron Burrows) and a team of
scientists and assistants, which includes Carter (Thomas Jane), Dr. Jim
Whitlock (Stellan Skarsgard), Tom Scoggins (Micharl Rapaport), marine biologist
Janice Higgins (Jacqueline McKenzie), and chef Sherman Dudley (LL Cool J) are
all working hard for a cure to the nasty disease of Alzheimer's.  Three deadly
sharks are the test subjects for Susan's cure for reactivating brain cells, as
handled by shark expert Carter.  Russell Franklin (Samuel L. Jackson), who is
about to live another survival situation (He was lost in an avalanche), is the
financial backer of the experiment, and has come to the research center to see
investigate the experiment, that has the potential to save thousands of lives.
In result of the cure being tested on the sharks, they "got smarter."  The
sharks can now recognize objects, and hunt like they've never hunted before. 
What results from a great setup is a 110 minute, exciting movie that is all but
impressive, but instead just summer fun.  It's not that hard Hollywood.  To
make a good movie, you need character development, good acting, a strong
screenplay, and good scenery.  It's not so difficult- Especially when the plot
outline, which is barely paid attention to in Deep Blue Sea, is as clever as it
is.  Although the other 90 minutes which are spent by sharks chasing humans
isn't the most original thing to be seen on screen this summer, the film is
powered by a strong soundtrack, a few choice performances, and rather clever,
intense horror sequences here and there.  Other than that, Deep Blue Sea feels
like the 1998 film I Still Know What You Did Last Summer, in which four teens
are deserted on an island, to be stalked by a fisherman in a slicker, only this
film features sharks.    
LL Cool J shines in Deep Blue Sea, as his character is one we care about, with
his funny one liners, and his lovable little parrot.  Cool J puts feeling into
his three dimensional character, as he did in his last film, 1998's Halloween:
H20.  LL Cool J, whose real name is James Smith, started out in the rap music
business, has turned to acting, and this transition was smart, as a very
talented actor he is. Aside from Cool J's Dudley, there are no other likable
characters, all having one dimensional personalities, but performed well by
those actors who portray them.  Saffron Burrows, who gave the only performance
worth watching in last spring's Wing Commander, does what she can with her
character, but the screenplay has her talking smart rather than showing human
emotion.
Deep Blue Sea's screenplay features no clever dialogue, lacks originality, as
it steals ideas from 1975's Jaws, Alien (1979), and Anaconda (1997), and spends
no time developing characters.  The screenplay features the focus characters
running from water and sharks for almost the entire running time, but doesn't
spend one second of the time making you care for the characters, excluding LL
Cool J's Dudley.  On the positive side of the screenplay, who is going to get
eaten by the vicious sharks is as unpredictable as the 1996 horror hit Scream.
 Once the main characters start getting torn to shreds, you know that anyone
could be next.  Instead of doing what movies should do, Deep Blue Sea relies on
the special effects and intense chase sequences to pull the viewer in, which it
occasionally does.  The special effects have nothing to do with the intenseness
of the film, as the computer generated sharks are unbelievably fake.  They swim
around as if they were anacondas, and when are shown close up, they look like a
rubber model of a shark.  With today's wonderful technology, you think they
would be able to at least succeed with the main focus of the film- the sharks.
The Bottom Line- A fun, yet frustrating summer film.  Such strong potential. 
Sigh. 

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more movie reviews and trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
There was a time when films like JAWS and THE SHINING (9/10) scared the
beejesus out of us. Nowadays, special effects have taken over the movie
industry and Hollyland expects us to be thrilled by computer-generated
houses and sharks. THE HAUNTING (4/10) failed miserably at this task, DEEP
BLUE SEA on the other hand, chewed right into it and bit off my thumb up!
PLOT:
A team of research scientists genetically toy with sharks in order to find a
cure for the human disorder of Alzheimer. When things go awry, the sharks
get smarter, angrier and stronger. They also want to chew up those damn
humans!
CRITIQUE:
In my mind, the definition of a "fun summer popcorn flick" has something to
do with turning off your brain at the door, enjoying the thrills and chills
of a preposterous yet interesting situation, laughing, biting your
fingernails, and having a blast, whilst digging into your preferred snack de
la jour (Nachos, cheese and salsa for me, thank you very much). If you go
into this movie expecting to find the answers to genetic testing on animals
and its ability to cure human diseases, you will be highly disappointed. If,
on the other hand, you are going into this film expecting to find some
cool-looking sharks chewing on human bodies, one-liners galore, over-the-top
situations which hold you in bated breath, and a motley cast of diverse
characters just waiting to be ripped to bits by these mutated sharks...then
this puppy is definitely the summer movie for you! Think...JAWS on speed.
Unlike THE HAUNTING (4/10), this summer film doesn't rely solely on its
special effects to do the trick. It adds interesting and entertaining
characters, a plausible plot, some nice style, a heart-pounding score and
even some genre-bending surprises here and there. I personally would have
liked to have seen more of those rapid-fire sharks crunching into folk, but
hey, I'm just a guy munching on nachos down here. The plot also doesn't take
long to get going, and once it does, you could expect all kinds of crazy
shark action. The story is obviously not rich in breadth, with a simple
"shark angry-let's get away from the shark" explanation covering the rest of
the film, but director Renny Harlin makes sure that we all have a blast in
the meantime. Actor-wise, it is LL Cool J who steals the show with his
one-liners, with the "Sam Jackson scene" being the most memorable, and the
shark wrangler dude, Thomas Jane, also pulling in a fine performance. If you
can't stomach scenes featuring humans being chewed up by large sharks, well
guess what, stay away from this movie! But if you're looking for mindless
entertainment, with a diverse cast, fun thrills and some super cool sharks,
sharpen your fins and get your ass on over to your nearest multiplex, and
prepare to dive right into this deep blue sea of blood (Okay, okay...no more
puns!).
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The "L" in Samuel L. Jackson's name stands for Leroy. Sam was an admitted
drug user until he completed drug rehab two weeks before playing a drug
addict in Spike Lee's JUNGLE FEVER. Some may remember him as Stacks Edwards
from Martin Scorsese's 1990 mob flick GOODFELLAS (10/10). He also played the
character of "Black Guy" in the 1989 Al Pacino thriller SEA OF LOVE
(7.5/10). His city of birth is Washington, D.C.
Director Renny Harlin's birth name is Lauri Mauritz Harjola. He was born in
Finland. He stands 6'4" and was married to tall actress Geena Davis for
about four years.
Thomas Jane's (The Shark Wrangler) mom is an antiques dealer and his dad is
a biogenetic-engineer. He has five younger siblings.
In the "wink or you'll miss it category", note that director Renny Harlin
can be seen leaving the seaport facilities with the rest of some folks near
the beginning of the movie. Guess he didn't want to stick around for any of
the carnage, eh?
This film was originally titled TIME OUT.
The first scene of this film could easily be interpreted as an homage to the
JAWS films.

Author
Jon Ridge
     There is a special-effects second or two in DEEP BLUE
SEA that makes the rest of the film stick out like a sore
thumb.  Samuel L. Jackson rambles incoherently, beginning
to raise his voice (in true SLJ fashion), about a botched...
avalanche mission (?), only to be rudely interrupted mid-
diatribe.  I'm not sure if this was itended as a bit of
self-referential parody - like, even non-human species'
can't stand bad dialogue - but that one, left field jolt
has more wit and humor than a dozen animated sharks or
dismembered bodies which litter the rest of DBS.
I'd like to compliment the local chain where I saw
this film, on Wednesday.  General Cinema, on 6th and Pine,
in Seattle:  great projection/picture quality; vivid color;
great sound; nice, panoramic screen.  Maybe it was just
that I saw one of the first showings of the day, I don't
know.  Sometimes, extraneous elements like these can influence
your viewing experience to the degree you find yourself
enjoying a film - even though, objectively speaking, it
sucks otherwise, probably.  And, I guess that's the case with
DEEP BLUE.  The premise is nifty:  six strangers stuck in
an oceanic research facility, headed by Saffron "could-I-look-
more-bored" Burrows, which is filling up with water, floor by
floor.  "We'll go down, to go up," they decide.  But, how;
what with man-eating Mako at every turn.  Swim 200 feet to the
surface and, having successfully held your breath, there would
still be the sharks to contend with until you've gotten safely
out of the water.  Not to mention avoiding them during the
ascent.  Because they move lightning fast, these sharks, whereas
an average person can only swim "two feet per second".  Not good
odds.  Plan B: stay put, and be killed via the eminent flood, or
a set of razors for teeth, whichever comes first.
The scenario reminded me, in a way, of the husband/wife
scene from THE ABYSS, when they came to the realization that one
of them was going to drown.  DBS has none of that tension or
impact, but the idea's there.
Also, the film looks fabulous.  Visual highlights include a
monkey-bar routine from a ladder, as water rises from below and
fireballs drip from high overhead; an underwater explosion, seen
through a fence; the death of a parrot; an aerial shot of Aquatica,
at sunset.  The shark attacks are explicit (check that twitching
foot), but not over the top; no need to get gross.  The cinema-
tography, I forget who by, is often stunning.
Yet, alas, looks are not everything.  Uh uh, not with this
measure of profoundly stilted dialogue ("Who ya gonna trust?  Me.
Cuz, I'm trust-worthy"), and performances this bland; Thomas Jane
is an expressionless actor - though nowhere the league of Viggo
Mortensen - to avoid... not to self.  The prologue, about reactivating
brain cells, feels profunctory and interminable.  And the action,
when it comes, isn't nearly the envelope-pushing sort I expect from
Renny Harlin (I'm thinking, LONG KISS GOODNIGHT... and scratching
my head).
In an interview, for Entertainment Tonight (I believe),
preceding the movie, Director Harlin described DEEP BLUE SEA as
"JAWS for the next generation".  Nope.

Author
Jon Popick
PLANET SICK-BOY:  http://www.sick-boy.com
Offering nothing viewers haven't already seen in much superior films
(The Abyss and Alien, for example), DBS does to Jaws what Mulholland
Falls did to Chinatown  dumbs it down, drags it out, and leaves viewers
as unsatisfied as Rosie O'Donnell when the all-you-can-eat buffet closes
down before she's finished.
The film opens with a shot of four teens enjoying a calm night out on
Daddy's boat.  One of the bikinied beauties accidentally kicks a bottle
of red wine over, spilling it into the dark water, which of course
prompts a shark attack.  Now, correct me if I'm wrong, but didn't Gary
Oldman say that he didn't care for red wine in Bram Stoker's Dracula?
Why would a shark get all riled up about red wine?  Anyway, the kids are
saved at the last second when the shark is harpooned not once, but twice
by Carter Blake (Thomas Jane, The Thin Red Line), who seems to have
appeared out of nowhere.
It turns out that the shark actually escaped from a genetic testing site
where scientists are hoping to create a cure for Alzheimer's disease.
The company funding the project, understandably alarmed by the AWOL
shark and its Friday night assault, gives its leader, Susan McAlester
(Saffron Burrows, Wing Commander), 48 hours to come up with their
antidote and even assigns Russell Franklin (Samuel L. Jackson, Episode
One) to baby-sit the project in its final hours in a last-ditch attempt
to salvage the price of the company's stock on Monday morning.
Once Susan returns to Aquatica, which was formerly a sub refueling
station used in World War II, almost everybody goes home (a skeleton
crew runs the place on weekends), and those that remain ignore the
impending storm that is rapidly approaching their facility.  Damn it 
that's what the Doppler is there for!  At one point, the tower worker
(Aida Turturro) calls Susan up to the surface for an `emergency' that
turns out not to be a warning about a hurricane, but a surprise birthday
party.  Yay!
In addition to Jane's Blake, other characters are the severely wasted
Stellan Skarsgĺrd (Ronin), the severely annoying Michael Rapaport (TV's
Friends), the severely pixie-ish Jacqueline McKenzie (Angel Baby) and
the surprisingly entertaining LL Cool J (Halloween: H2O) as Dudley, the
cook.  You know a film is in trouble when a rap star, and his parrot
sidekick, are the highlights.
Once the group is trapped within the confines of the station, we learn
that Jackson's Franklin is somewhat of an expert in surviving difficult
situations.  Apparently he lived through a killer avalanche while
mountain climbing in the Alps several years back.  Not being too
familiar with the Alzheimer's project, he at one point loudly questions,
`Just what the hell did you do to those sharks?'  Well, Mace Windu, just
who the hell is reading your scripts?  Didn't you learn to stay away
from crappy underwater pictures after Sphere?
DBS is the writing debut from a trio of screenwriters and is directed by
Renny Harlin (The Long Kiss Goodnight).  The score is provided by Yes'
Trevor Rabin and the special effects are far from dazzling.  Maybe I
just don't find sharks all that frightening.  It's a shark - we know
what they look like.  It's not like Alien or The Abyss.  They even
showed the stupid thing in the trailer, so how scared can you be when
you see it?  Despite one particular scene that made the entire theater
jump and scream, the film is largely a waste.  (1:56 - R for graphically
dumb shark attacks, for language and for Burrows in bra and panties)

Author
Susan Granger
http://www.speakers-podium.com/susangranger.
 It's "The Poseidon Adventure" meets "Jaws."  Researchers
aboard the floating laboratory Aquatica have come up with an amazing
pharmaceutical discovery. Using mako sharks, they have discovered the
key to regenerating human brain tissue - thus curing Alzheimer's and
other degenerative diseases. Only a doctor has violated ethical codes,
genetically re-engineering DNA, making the experimental specimens
smarter and faster. Suddenly a tropical storm strikes, and chaos
reigns as the scientists are being stalked by the predators. The crew
of this underwater compound, stranded on various submerged levels,
must try to get to the surface - any way they can - as, one by one,
they're chased and attacked. That's the predictable plot concocted by
writers Duncan Kennedy, Donna Powers & Wayne Powers. Director Renny
Harlin ("The Long Kiss Goodnight," "Cutthroat Island," "Cliffhanger")
focuses his attention on action and carnage. The sharks are
animatronic with some CG effects, not totally believable, but Harlin
effectively uses the elements of shock and surprise. British actress
Saffron Burrows is a dead-ringer for Harlin's ex-wife, Geena Davis,
and shark-wrangler Thomas Jane resembles Kevin Costner in
"Waterworld."  In the casting process, their looks were obviously more
important than their acting ability. Rapper LL Cool J, as Preacher,
the parrot-loving cook, is the most memorable character, along with
Stellan Skarsgard, the project director, and Samuel L. Jackson as the
financier whose company supports Aquatica. Of course, what you're
wondering is: who will survive? On the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10,
"Deep Blue Sea" is a shallow yet scary 6. It's a monster movie that
will have you dreading water.

Author
Christopher Null
     It's been a few years since a good shark movie, and while LAKE
PLACID played games with the monster movie genre, DEEP BLUE SEA aims to
please with an old-fashioned thriller where, once again, the beasts are
much smarter than the prey (the people).
     The story is familiar  genetic tampering makes sharks brilliantly
intelligent  and they want nothing more than to eat people.  Along the
food chain are Samuel Jackson, Saffron Burrows, Thomas Jane, and Michael
Rapaport.  But most notable is rapper LL Cool J as a cook/preacher who
provides much-needed comic relief to the proceedings.
     Burrows and Jackson are also fun (with Burrows redeeming herself
for the debacle of WING COMMANDER earlier this year), and a mostly
clever and zippy script keeps the film alive.  Director Renny Harlin
seems to be back in decent form, too.  And the CGI sharks are awfully
well-done, with some of the best biting-a-person-in-half sequences ever
put on film, he said, only slightly sarcastically.
     Ultimately, DEEP BLUE SEA lands somewhere between THE ABYSS and
LEVIATHAN in the pantheon of underwater monster thrillers.  It's not
great and it doesn't suck, but it'll get your date to jump into your
lap, and that's really what a movie like this is all about, right?
Director: Renny Harlin
Producer: Akiva Goldsman, Robert Kosberg, Tony Ludwig, Alan Riche
Writer: Duncan Kennedy, Wayne Powers, Donna Powers
Starring: Samuel L. Jackson, Saffron Burrows, Thomas Jane, Stellan
Skarsgard, LL Cool J, Michael Rapaport
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Author
Choo Eng Aun, Jack
Directed by Renny Harlin
Starring : Samuel L. Jackson, Saffron Burrows, LL Cool J
Running Time : 1hr 50mins (approx)
Rating : ***1/2 out of *****
Now, lets first look into the history of Shark films. There was the
unforgettable JAWS. The exciting JAWS 2. The rather flaky JAWS 3D and
sometime in the late 90s another film of the same genre that I can't seem to
recall (about the son of JAWS returning to wreak revenge or something like
that). Now, with the magic of CGI, one shark is simply not enough; in DEEP
BLUE SEA, there are 3 big, mean and really smart ones!
Russell Frankiln (Jackson) visits Aquatica (a sea-bound research center),
where a research is being conducted on the extraction of a hormone substance
found uniquely within the shark brain that can cure and reverse the effects
of Alzheimer's disease. The substance is small in quantity and because of
this, lead researcher Dr. Susan MacAlaester genetically alters the shark DNA
and grows them twice the size with brains as big as humans, naturally
producing more of the much treasured hormones.
As sure as the sun sets in the west, a shark breaks lose and wreaks havoc
within the facility during a hormone extraction procedure. With the
flexibility offered by CGI, the sharks get more full-length screen time as
their predecessors did in those remote-controlled rubber suit days. Gone are
the days of people getting pulled under the water with the water turning red
right after. This time, we get to see the entire gobbling action, with
floating limbs and all.
So-so acting, expected in most of your average action film. Jackson (fresh
from his Jedi Master role in THE PHANTOM MENACE), takes on the dark-side
force of a different kind and fits well with his wise-cracking lines. LL
Cool J's cook role as Preacher, does for this film what Steven Seagal's cook
could only dream to achieve in his two UNDER SIEGE films.
DEEP BLUE SEA does not offer any of the psychological thrills that JAWS has
to offer. It does however, prove to be a refreshing follow-up within the
genre, full of visual thrills, suspense and believe it or not  humour! Its
like JURASSIC PARK under water.
Nothing too stressful, pure entertainment. Renny Harlin, you are forgiven
(for making CUTTHROAT ISLAND).
Visit my film reviews site ! http://members.tripod.com/jackchoo

Author
Jamie Peck
Rating: *** (out of ****)
Warner Bros. / 1:45 / 1999 / R (language, shark-attack gore)
Cast: Thomas Jane; Saffron Burrows; Samuel L. Jackson, LL Cool J;
Stellan Skarsgĺrd, Michael Rapaport, Jacqueline McKenzie; Aida Turturro
Director: Renny Harlin
Screenplay: Duncan Kennedy; Wayne Powers; Donna Powers
For director Renny Harlin, it's good to go back in the water. Four years
after his pirate debacle "Cutthroat Island" drowned at the box office
and sank a studio - Carolco Films - Harlin is again plundering a mostly
oceanic setting in "Deep Blue Sea." The surprising result: a movie with
bite, and not just because this loud-and-proud thriller plays very much
like "Jaws" on crank. A set-up that sounds supremely goofy still allows
for plenty of monster-flick fun, from the game performances to the gory
special effects to the grisly body count.
Forgive "Deep Blue Sea" of its wince-inducing exposition, which makes it
seem destined for straight-to-video oblivion: Scientists aboard a
floating laboratory in the Pacific, desperately searching for an
Alzheimer's cure, have genetically enhanced mako sharks for their groovy
brain tissue, only the test subjects turn on them after inadvertently
gaining supersmarts from the experiment. Silly mortals. It's not nice to
fool Mother Nature, especially if Mother Nature is 25 feet long, 8,000
pounds heavy, irritable, fast and hungry.
These fierce fishies escape following an early mishap involving a
gurney, a helicopter and wet walkways that reduces the principle cast by
nearly a third and can also stand among the finest sequences Harlin has
ever helmed - which is saying a lot, given that he's also overseen some
uniquely eye-popping stunts in "Die Hard 2," "Cliffhanger" and "The Long
Kiss Goodnight." The rest of "Deep Blue Sea" takes the form of a
"Titanic"-"Jurassic Park" hybrid as our rag-tag team of heroes avoids
snack status while escaping from their slowly submerging facility.
Character players like Michael Rapaport, Aida Turturro and Stellan
Skarsgĺrd are guaranteed goners as various nondescript hands, while the
great Samuel L. Jackson - the movie's sole recognizable name - caps his
stint as the study's bigshot bankroller with his typical dramatic fire.
He and Oscar always seem to be mentioned in the same breath, but not
this time. The real stories here the scary computer-generated and robot
beasties, thrilling wall-to-wall carnage and a breakthrough performance
from indie find Thomas Jane.
Jane - built, blonde and a Baltimore native to boot - makes for one
memorable action figure, especially in scenes where his stoic but
charismatic wrangler faces danger and returns a champ. He's the guy
audiences will most want to see pull through without becoming human
sushi, though LL Cool J rates a close second. As a religious cook who
knows his way around a kitchen, this amiable rapper-cum-actor does for
"Deep Blue Sea" what he did for "Halloween: H20" last summer - energize
an effective creep show with a comic dimension.
But the ringmaster of this crafty creature feature is still Harlin. He
knows when to comfortably cater to genre conventions - death-defying
dangles, close shaves, situation-appropriate kiss-off lines - and when
to stray from cliches, as evidenced by several tricks and treats thatll
take many viewers by surprise. The pinnacle of these - a sudden,
terrifying attack not, for once, foreshadowed by a stinging musical
score or a tracking camera shot - is delicious, disorienting and
altogether unexpected, just like the sum of "Deep Blue Sea."
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"Here it is at last, the first 150-minute trailer. Armageddon' is cut
together like its own highlights. Take almost any 30 seconds at random,
and you'd have a TV ad. The movie is an assault on the eyes, the ears,
the brain, common sense and the human desire to be entertained. No
matter what they're charging to get in, it's worth more to get out."
-Roger Ebert on "Armageddon"

Author
James Sanford
     If science can make sharks super-intelligent, why can't it do the
same for screenwriters?
That's the question posed by "Deep Blue Sea," a thriller set in an
undersea lab where medical researcher Susan McAlester (Saffron Burrows)
and her crew are being hunted by predators of their own creation. The
essentials of the storyline are best summed up by McAlester's hypertense
co-worker Tom (Michael Rapaport): "She screwed with the sharks, and now
the sharks are screwin' with us!".
 Directed by Renny Harlin, the man who gave us "Die Hard 2: Die
Harder" and "Cliffhanger" when he was at his peak and the infamous
"Cutthroat Island" at his nadir, "Sea" is essentially a series of
explosions and crises, occasionally interrupted by stern warnings about
the consequences of fooling around with Mother Nature. The movie is so
poorly written it's almost laughable, but it does provide a few genuine
jolts, which is more than can be said for most of the current crop of
horror films.
 "Sea" begins with McAlester inviting financier Russell Franklin
(Samuel L. Jackson) to her base of operations, in hope of convincing him
not to cut off funding for her quest to find a cure for Alzheimer's
Disease. She and her staff have been using "hormonal enhancers" to
tinker with the brains of a trio of sharks at their Aquatica compound
and McAlester is certain a breakthrough is just around the corner.
 Unfortunately, so is a typhoon, which devestates Aquatica and
nearly kills everyone in it. Soon the hallways are flooded, the escape
routes are impassable and the humans are turning into snacks for their
toothy pet monsters.
 "These sharks aren't just breaking down doors for the fun of
it," Franklin realizes. "They're after us!" Most of the major lines in
"Sea" are followed by exclaimation points; the rest of the insipid
dialogue by first-time writers Duncan Kennedy, Wayne Powers and Donna
Powers is either mumbled or drowned out by the thousands of gallons of
water that wash over the cast at regular intervals.
 Among those struggling to survive alongside Franklin and
McAlester are daredevil Carter Blake (Thomas Jane), simpering Janice
(Jacqueline McKenzie) and a Gospel-spouting cook nicknamed Preach (LL
Cool J), whose sidekick is a profane parrot -- really. None of the
actors is required to do much more than shriek, swim or scramble to get
out of the scene as quickly as possible. Those who like to see
dismemberment up close will be delighted by Harlin's insistance that we
get a look at every severed arm and leg in full, bloody detail.
 The attacks -- at least one of which is a real surprise -- are
generally exciting, although someone should have informed the authors
that just because a shark may have increased his brain size does not
necessarily mean he'll know how to turn on an oven, as one does here in
the movie's most ludicrous sequence. For a movie about the advancement
of knowledge, "Sea" is often flabbergastingly dumb. James Sanford

Author
Matthew Brissette
Warning: the following contains one MAJOR spoiler. I'm not kidding ,
folks. Read this and you will not be able to properly enjoy Deep Blue
Sea's most effective sequence. I'm talking about one of those "straight
out of the left field , never saw that one coming , holy shit where the
hell did that come from" moments. Really. Trust me on this , this is one
of those scenes that only comes around once or twice per year. One of
those scenes that you will never be able to see coming even if I freeze
frame the film a second before it happens and you sit there trying to
imagine what will happen next for the several hours. Oh yeah , it's a
doozy. If you don't want to know what I am talking about then don't (
please please please ) read any further because I would hate to ruin
this scene for you. Okay , enough of this. Read on if you have already
seen the movie , simply think that I am blowing things out of
proportions or just don't care.
I know what you are thinking. "Oh but Matthew , he just gets eaten
during the movie's last five minutes while saving the lives of the other
survivors." Bite me. You are wayyyy off if that is what you think
happens to Sam. 
The sharks eat Samuel L. Jackson. They eat him somewhere around thirty
minutes into the movie. He's only the second person to die in the movie.
Whoah. Nothing quite says "Nyahahaha , you thought this was just going
to be another lame monster movie...well kiss my ass cuz from now on all
bets are off!" like a flick's only big name star getting chewed into
itty bitty little pieces with about an hour and a half left to the
movie. 
Deep Blue Sea takes every familiar monster movie cliche you can think of
and quite gleefully throws them to the sharks to play with. In other
words , place bets on which group of characters you think are going to
live or die during the course of this movie and be prepared to lose a
whole lot of money. If you still think that you know who will make it
out alive after reading the above paragraphs then you must have read the
script or have psychic powers.
In a summer strangely empty of , well , summer movies , Deep Blue Sea is
like a breath of fresh air , or a refreshing swim in the pool , we might
as well stay nautical. Altough a swim will be the last thing on your
mind after seing this movie , at least bring your annoying kid brother
with you into the water. Might as well have him wear bright colored
swimming trunks while you are at it. Anyway...
 It's not a typical summer when most movies are either romantic comedies
, cartoons , small budget pictures and a lot of movies with little to no
big name stars ( where the hell are Nicolas cage , Sly , Ahnuld , Jim
Carrey , Bruce Willis and Mel Gibson this summer anyway? ) and the only
true summer movies either coming out before the season's official start
( The Matrix ) , right at it's very beginning ( The Mummy ) or were
surefire hits even they opened during the olympic games or the recent
JFK jr. fiasco. ( The Phantom Menace )
DBS is not far , by far , the smartest written movie of the summer but
since this is a popcorn movie that kind of goes without saying. This is
not a movie that you can criticize , it was conceived as a fun filled
way to spend two hours and it had no intentions of being a work of art. 
Now I like to be intelectually stimulated as much as the next guy but
once in a while it feels good to leave your brain at the door. It feels
even better when the movie you are going to see is not a effects filled
unscary bore like The Haunting but a movie with good , earnest
performances , fantastic effects ( a DBS topic that movie critics are
now waging war on , half of them say the effects are flawless , the
other half say they look fake. ) and several genuinely scary scenes ,
something that The Haunting cannot boast to contain.
Granted , director Renny Harlin rips HIMSELF off with a ladder scene
that any Cliffhanger fan will recognize , complete with the very same
camera angles , but the movie cannot be accused of ripping off or
copying jaws in any way , another theme that movie critics are obsessing
about. Aside from a clear homage , it can't really be called a rip off ,
of Jaws during the opening sequence the movie stays carefully clear of
that well worn path. 
Overall , this is the second best movie I have seen this summer and ,
quite frankly , the last movie that I really really really wanted to see
this summer. You know it's not a good summer when your must-see list of
movies is about 10 movies short of last year's. 
Deep Blue Sea: 8.5 out of 10 for the ultimate no-smoking advertisement ,
a shark "arming" itself ( nyehehe! ) , a shark with a very clear
attitude towards long speeches , overall good acting and a new twist on
the guess the next victim game.

Author
Greg King
DEEP BLUE SEA (M).  
(Warner Bros/Village Roadshow)
Director: Renny Harlin
Stars:  Thomas Jane, Saffron Burrows, Samuel L Jackson, L L Cool J, 
Michael Rapaport, Jacqueline McKenzie, Stellan Skarsgard, Aida Turturro,
Ronny Cox (uncredited)
Running time: 105 minutes.
Jaws with attitude!  There hasn't been a decent shark
adventure since the original Jaws (1975), although there have been
plenty of imitations and cheap rip-offs.  Just when we thought it was
safe to venture back into the water, along comes Deep Blue Sea, an
undeniably trashy but entertaining big budget B-grade thriller from
director Renny Harlin (Die Hard 2, The Long Kiss Goodnight, etc).
Deep Blue Sea hits our screens in the wake of other disappointing
water-bound stinkers, like Kevin Costner's awful Waterworld and the
dire Sphere, but this one works a treat.  If nothing else, this
enjoyable film will turn a number of people away from the beach this
summer.
Scientists at Aquatica, an ocean-based research station that
resembles something left over from the disastrous Waterworld, have
been tampering with Mako sharks in order to find a cure for
degenerative brain diseases, such as Alzheimer's.  As a result their
genetic tampering has turned a natural killing machine into a highly
intelligent, dangerous predator with a thirst for blood.  When a
savage tropical storm hits Aquatica and wrecks the place, the labs are
waterlogged and the sharks get free.  They begin hunting the
scientists as they desperately try to make their way to the surface.
The international cast includes Thomas Jane (who, from a
distance, bears a vague resemblance to Kevin Costner), Aussie actress
Jacqueline McKenzie (Angel Baby), Michael Rapaport, Saffron Burrows
(currently in Wing Commander, etc), rapper L L Cool J (who adds some
humour to the film), and the very busy Samuel L Jackson.  Half the fun
lies in working out which of these stars will become shark food and
who will survive.
The film was shot in the same huge tanks created for Titanic,
and delivers plenty of underwater action.  Special effects technology
and computer generated imaging have advanced since Spielberg's day,
allowing Harlin and his special effects crew to create thoroughly
menacing sharks that move through the water with awesome fluidity.
Harlin is a deft hand at spectacular action sequences, and this fast
paced film certainly delivers plenty of thrills.
Deep Blue Sea deftly combines elements of Jaws, Jurassic Park
and The Poseidon Adventure, as well as many of the clichés of the
popular disaster movie.  It is also reminiscent of the series of films
from the mid-'70's in which nature sought revenge on man for meddling
with the environment.  Many of those films took themselves far too
seriously, and consequently they were pretty silly.  However, the
makers of Deep Blue Sea seem aware of its inherent silliness, and the
film is all the better for it.  The film is cliché- ridden, with
lots of unintentionally corny and banal dialogue, but this all somehow
adds to the enjoyment of the whole thing.  
***1/2 
greg king
http://www.netau.com.au/gregking

Author
Alex Ioshpe
"Do you know anyone who is looking for a fun science fiction, but can't find
it?"
"What if we could end their suffering with a single film? I used genetic
technology to mutate some of the greatest box busters."
- "Just what the hell did you do to those films?"
"We combined 'Jurassic Park', 'Jaws' and 'Die Hard' into one motion picture.
As a side effect the level of intelligence dropped to zero, but the film got
funnier."
I think that this conversation pretty much sums this film up. Renny Harlin,
the director of 'Cliffhanger' and 'Die Hard 2' , has created one of the
friskiest movies of the summer.
In the most advanced research facility in the world, a team of specialists
is working against the clock on an experiment that will benefit mankind. But
before they can save millions of lives, they will have to find a way to save
their own...This is 'Jurassic Park' all over again, only with deadly, mean
sharks instead of dinosaurs. Off course it's not the same. The wonder and
excitement is gone and only the explosions and screams remain. Nearly all of
the action takes place on the Aquatica, an advanced deep sea research
laboratory that looks like a "floating Alcatraz." It's there that a small
group of marine biologists and other scientists are experimenting on three
genetically altered Mako sharks that are bigger, smarter, faster, and
deadlier than is typical for members of their species. The humans, led by
Doctors Susan McAlester (Saffron Burrows) and Jim Whitlock (Stellan
Skarsgĺrd), believe that a protein found in the sharks' brains can cure
Alzheimer's Disease. On the day that the project's founder, Russell Franklin
(Samuel L. Jackson), is on the Aquatica, all hell breaks loose. The sharks
turn violent, a tropical storm hits, and a helicopter crashes into the
station. A group of six - McAlester, Franklin, shark handler Carter Blake
(Thomas Jane), engineer Tom Scoggins (Michael Rapaport), preacher/cook
Dudley (LL Cool J), and scientist Janet Winters (Jacqueline McKenzie) - are
trapped below the surface, struggling against rising water levels while
avoiding three pairs of dangerous jaws. The characters, though not original
or well written, are nice. The kind of people you almost care about. Susan
is the John Hammond of this story is a scientist, resembling Frankenstein,
believing in sacrifices for the greater good, saying: "they will thank me
later". There is a sea hunter, who is a survivor of every situation. There
are several scientists and an adventurous billionaire that offers money for
a god cause, but is actually looking for adventure and excitement. And then
there is a colored cook, energetically played by LL Cool J. He is the simple
soul, with simple needs and simple goals in life. Walking around with a
parrot on his shoulder, he provides most of the comic relief.
For a movie of its genre, it's rather interesting. And although you probably
figure out that the sharks will eat everybody up, except the heroes who will
destroy them, this film has so many surprising moments that it will keep you
watching till the end. When the good guys start dying at the beginning, you
know that this is going to be cool.
Gossip, its premise and successful test screenings suggest that Harlin has
created 'Jaws' for the year 2000. What he has created is a fun action
thriller that is worth the ticket, but hardly anything more. It will make
you scream and laugh and jump, but it can't be compared to 'Jaws'. And
although Spielberg's classic only featured one ordinary great white, and not
three giant mutated ones, it still made a much greater impression. And the
key is talent. In 'Jaws' the shark was never shown. Which means that it was
all left to our imagination. It was us who created the most terrifying
monster, not digital special effects. The pure psychological effect, raw
horror and exceptionally written characters created the Devil, whose world
was the deep blue sea. 'Deep Blue Sea' is not that deep. It's simply fun to
watch. In films like this, screams are more satisfying than conversation.
That is why Renny Harlin wisely tightens his grip as he moves along -- radio
contact is lost, the levels are flooding one by one, the lights go off and
the sharks are coming..Logical flaws and irrational actions are as frequent
as small fish in the Mediterranean, but as any experienced science fiction
buff knows, that sort of things are a rule, rather than an exception. And
since it's not aiming very high, it finds itself in a very big company. It's
a masterful action film with every necessary element carefully inserted in
the right place at the right time.
The effects are flawless and the sharks look even more real than the real
ones. There are a lot of satisfying explosions and impressive under water
shots. This is Harlin's best work in a long time and although it won't make
any high lines, it succeeds in being exactly what it is supposed to be -- a
fun action film.

Author
Marty Mapes
*** (out of 4) "DEEP BLUE SEA is a shark movie with teeth!"
Yes, I'm trying to be quoted in ad copy. It's every unpaid critics'
dream.
DEEP BLUE SEA is a horror movie. It's not a thriller. It's not an action
movie. It's a horror movie, and it is a very good one. The film itself
has some bad writing and some terrible exposition-after the first ten
minutes of wooden speeches and clichéd setups, I was ready to give up on
it. But before long, the movie bares its teeth, bites down, and doesn't
let go.  
Russell Franklin ( Samuel L. Jackson) is the head of a big corporation
about to cut funding to a shark research facility, where the scientists
hope to find a cure for Alzheimer's. A plucky young scientist, Dr.
McAlester (Saffron Burrows), convinces him to visit the facility one
weekend in hopes he'll see the good work they're doing, and extend their
grant.
They've been experimenting with sharks in their gigantic, mid-ocean,
floating laboratory (complete with underwater pen). The scientists have
been tampering with the sharks' brains-trying to make them bigger so
they can extract more of the stuff that will make their Alzheimer's
drug.
The first night of Russell's visit, a big storm rolls in and the
facility is hit hard. At the same time, the brainy sharks start acting
up. One of the sedated specimens wakes up too soon and severely wounds
one of the 10-man crew. As the crew tries to get a rescue chopper for
the wounded scientist, the sharks start attacking the facility with
deliberate intent-seems their new brains are making them smarter.
Between the storm and the sharks, the small crew becomes trapped. 
Now damaged, the facility becomes a cage for the humans as well. The
sharks continue to attack the facility and its crew as the "floating
Alcatraz" starts to sink. The survivors must figure out a way to stay
afloat while avoiding the omnipresent supersharks.
Despite some clunky writing and lame exposition, DEEP BLUE SEA is a
satisfying horror movie. It has what horror movies have lost, namely,
RUTHLESSNESS.
It seems like a lot of extras die and a lot of main characters survive
in horror movies. It gets to be where you can predict who's going to
live and who's going to die, and in what order.
Sometimes the formula contains a "morality" indicator as well, that
kills off whoever "deserves" to die. Paul Rieser's slick, greedy
character in ALIENS is an obvious example. Or if you prefer slasher
flicks, you could predict a kill if the victim was 1) a teenager at
summer camp, and 2) about to have sex.
DEEP BLUE SEA shuns all of that in favor of sheer ruthless terror. I
knew, as soon as I saw somebody's loveable pet get swallowed whole, that
there was no telling who would live by who "deserved" it. It used to be
the rule that the loyal dog always had to survive, but no more.
And that, in essence, is what makes DEEP BLUE SEA a good horror movie.
It is scary, ruthless, and unpredictable. If that doesn't impress you,
then don't go see it because the bad writing will stand out even more.
Those of us who enjoy a good scare will have fun without you.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.moviehabit.com

Author
Ross Anthony
About ten minutes into the picture, our primary characters chopper to an
off-shore facility faintly reminiscent of a well-kept "Water World" set
presented in such a way that you just know you'll be spending the rest of
the film there.
"Deep Blue Sea" has all the classic elements: The shark swimming hero (who
actually delivers a pretty good performance), the money guy, the preacher
(LL Cool J), the architectural guy, the innocent and lovely assistant, the
mad scientist (in this case, sexy and mad), and of course the beasts ...
smart sharks. Seems sharks have some protein in their brains that when
extracted can reverse the effects of Alzheimer's disease. I'm not sure why,
but instead of harvesting from lots of sharks, our mad scientist decides to
grow three sharks and enlarge their brains. "You've just taken nature's best
killing machine and given it will and desire." This fair piece of dialogue
aside, plenty of hokey lines abound (of which, Samuel L. Jackson, more oft
than not the lucky deliverer) setting our screening audience laughing in a
sort of cliché-induced hysteria.
For reasons less than obvious, all of the experimentation takes place
submerged under the ocean surface.
If you can bite that off, you might just have a good time ooowing and
aaahing at all the action (I did). Though the actual shark visuals aren't
remarkable, other action (I don't want give anything away) is rather
explosive. Nicely directed and seldom a dull moment, "Deep Blue Sea" swims
from beginning to end with well placed and carefully timed bumps, sputters
and twists.
It's no "Jaws," it's not really that scary, but it is fun.
Starring Saffron Burrows, Thomas Jane, LL Cool J and Samuel L. Jackson.
Directed by Renny Harlen. Screenplay by Duncan Kennedy and Donna Powers &
Wayne Powers. Produced by Akiva Goldsman, Tony Ludwig and Alan Riche at
Warner Brothers.
Grade ......................................... B+
(C) 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted and shot
documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across North
America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Ron Small
SPARKLER (1999)
GRADE: D
Director: Darren Stein
Screenplay: Darren Stein, Catherine Eads
Starring: Park Overall, Veronica Cartwright, Freddie Prinze Jr., Jamie Kennedy,
Steven Petracca, Don Harvey, Sandy Martin
 
The rise of certain indie filmmakers is somewhat baffling to me. You have a guy
like Morgan J. Freeman who directed HURRICANE STREETS, a flick that was lauded
as a "gritty" street drama, and ended up being about as authentic as
confederated products. His picture was a Sundance Film Festival favorite paving
the way for more mediocrity from Freeman (namely, DESERT BLUE). Then you have a
talented guy like Larry Fessenden, who directed the chilling urban\gothic
horror tale, HABIT on 16mm film, because he could not secure a budget large
enough to make it on 35 mm. Maybe this is because of the increasing
"mainstreaming" of indie films. Is HAPPY TEXAS (1999's Sundance champ) a clever
indie, or a very 80's one-joke buddy movie? It feels an awful lot like the
latter, yet it received many accolades for essentially being a low budget
throwback to the days of WHAT ABOUT BOB? So many indies are being produced
(every major studio has an indie wing that specializes in "alternative" films)
that many have began ripping each other off (example: ANOTHER DAY IN PARADISE
is DRUGSTORE COWBOY minus Matt Dillon plus James Woods). The independent film
makers who kick started the "indie revolution" in the early 90's (David
O.Russel, Robert Rodriguez, Richard Linklater, Todd Solondz) have turned to
major studios for their funding, while Tarantino wannabes churn out the junk
that now passes for independent film.
This brings me to Darren Stein, who directed SPARKLER in 1997, later released
in 1999 presumably because of Freddie Prinze Jr.'s rapid rise to stardom. This
picture gave Stein a chance to direct the similarly awful JAWBREAKER (also
released in 1999). Both films bare the mark of an overzealous film geek with
little to say of his own. JAWBREAKER was like a Puff Daddy remix of popular
teen flicks from the past and present, incorporating bits form CLUELESS,
SCREAM, HEATHERS, the T.V show PARKER CAN'T LOSE, and CARRIE to form a
look-at-how-hip-I-am pastiche of bubble-gum teen alienation with nary a genuine
emotion to be found amid the stolen celluloid. So, SPARKLER'S gotta be better
right? After all this was the film that studio executives at Sony Pictures saw,
thus giving them the incentive to sign this guy, and fork over the cash for him
to direct JAWBREAKER.
Well, it isn't the first time nor will it be the last time that studio
executives were wrong. And I knew I was in trouble after the first five minutes
whereupon we are introduced to a group of stereotypically cartoonish trailer
trash. The SPARKLER is Mattie (sitcom veteran Park Overall) a little girl stuck
in a middle-aged woman's body (figuratively of course). She's a
head-in-the-clouds dreamer, who finds an opportunity to pursue her dreams after
discovering her husband is cheating on her. She dresses herself in a bright
green, sparkly get-up and saunters off to a local bar. Meanwhile three city
boys on their way to Vegas converge at the bar after a flat tire stalls them.
The leader of the click appears to be Brad (Freddie Prinze Jr.), a bossy
aspiring Hollywood agent. Joel (Steven Petracca) is a grumpy, hapless fellow
with a secret, and Trent (Jamie Kennedy) is the sweet puppy dog of the group.
They spot Mattie from far away, commenting on her fashion sense ("Wow, somebody
actually morphed a human being and a disco ball"). She approaches the boys
querying them for a dance, to which only Trent responds. He is enchanted with
her for whatever reason. However the boys find it more difficult to ditch her
then they originally thought. Following circumstances too moronic to recount,
she winds up meeting them in Vegas, while searching for an old high school
friend, Dottie (Veronica Cartwright). Dottie is an ex-showgirl, now a stripper
in a scruffy lesbian strip joint, complete with overzealous transvestites.
Meanwhile Mattie's redneck husband comes looking for her.
At first Stein's movie is like a sweeter, less satiric, more amateurish, John
Waters film. Like Waters he pores on the sleaze (we get the aforementioned
transvestite strippers, cursing old biddies, and Dottie's attempted molestation
of Freddie Prinze Jr.), though unlike Waters he isn't intelligent about it. His
sleaze serves no purpose. None of it is well done enough to be entertaining,
nor is it thoughtful enough to be absorbing. It's just there. His characters
are all caricatures (just like in all Waters' films), but they aren't smartly
drawn caricatures. They're simplistic and predictable.
It's a shame that Stein had to cast Overall in his hodgepodge of rubbish. She
seems to have really invested in her part. Overall has a smokey-hickory
southern accent that's both grating and comforting. She's an aged dreamer with
a shimmering naďve smile, and the actress sometimes suggests depth and
poignancy in simple gestures. It's too bad that it's at the service of this
dull tripe.
While I actively disliked both of Stein's films don't think I'm dooming his
career. After all M. Night Shyamalan directed two completely forgettable
formula pictures (PRAYING WITH ANGER, WIDE AWAKE) before turning out the very
well made (though still slightly flawed in my book) THE SIXTH SENSE. Sometimes
talent seemingly springs out of the places you least expect it to. Maybe Stein
will grow up by his next endeavor. Then again, maybe it will take longer than
that: His upcoming project has been described as a combo of SEVEN and BLADE
RUNNER.

Author
Nick Lyons
  So far this year, we haven't seen many fast paced or exciting films.  Mummy
fell flat, due to cardboard acting, Entrapment was a laughfest, and The
Haunting failed to work at all.  Deep Blue Sea itself has many faults, but it
entertains, despite a deep hole in it's script.
  In this film we are brought to a deep sea station where scientists (Saffron
Burrows,Thomas Jane, Michael Rappaport) franticly work on a project that may
cure Alzheimer's.  The process is a bit complicated though, and that's where
things go balistic.  The scientists use the shark's brain tissue to see if
there is a way to cure this disease, but there isn't enough time to get into
this storyline.  The sharks are suddenly smarter as they close in on the group
of scientists.  The film quickly becomes a race to get out of the facility, to
avoid these smart sharks. This may sound like a nice thrill-ride, but it
suffers mainly from being a rip-off.
  Many of the key action scenes are exciting, but are worn out.  Why you may
ask? because it all seems too familiar.  The deep sea station looks like
something out of Waterworld, the hallways and some of the water sets look like
a scene from  Alien Resurrection, the sharks of course are much like Jaws, the
race to get out is like a scene out of the Poseidon Adventure, and even with
Samuel L. Jackson aboard, it reminds you of Jurassic Park in ways.  Everything
just feels like a recurring dream here, and that's not even half of the
problems.
  It's not surprising to me the acting was stale.  In every blockbuster this
year, this seems to be a forgotten element.  They roam around and act like
complete airheads until they encounter a creature (usually a digital effect). 
It's then they start running, and by then you could care less about them. Once
again that's what happens here.   Thankfully only Samuel L. Jackson's talent
was wasted, since the rest of the cast haven't been noticed in any other film,
except for LL Cool J.  He too tries to step up, but is only here to provide
comic relief. Cheap relief at that.
  On the brighter side, this film actually was kind of fun, believe it or not. 
Even if the characters were bland, the sharks were there to entertain the
audience while they wreak havoc aboard the station.  Oddly enough the sharks
aren't 50 feet tall like they are on the poster, in fact they're rather small. 
The only problem I had with the sharks were, that they were a bit too animated
during a feast.  Other than that, they were basically the only thing of
interest in this film.
  When it's all over, it's a bit shocking and disappointing. So far this year,
most of the blockbusters have let audiences down, due to lack of characters and
script. It's the closest thing teens will get to seeing Jaws on the big screen,
minus the scares.

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Thomas Jane; Saffron Burrows; Samuel L. Jackson; Jaqueline McKenzie
& Michael Rapaport
Let me first start out by saying that Steven Speilberg made the greatest
shark film ever made with Jaws. But Renny Harlin has come in a very, very,
very close second with Deep Blue Sea. Deep Blue Sea is easily the best new
movie that I have seen this year, and is far and away the best of the crop
from the summer of '99. Sure, The Phantom Menace was spectacular, but no
movie has been this much fun in a long time. I can honestly say that do not
remember ever having jumped so much during a film. When I was not jumping in
my seat, my hands were firmly grasping the armrests steeling myself for the
next scare that I knew was going to be right around the corner. At one point
in his career, director Renny Harlin looked as if he may easily become one
of the best directors in the business. His successes included Die Hard 2 and
Cliffhanger. In recent years he has faltered, making such fare as Cutthroat
Island. Well, Renny is back, and with a vengeance.
Saffron Burrows stars as the head of a scientific research team that is
trying to develop a cure for Alzheimer's disease. Their potential cure
involves extracting fluids from the brains of mako sharks. In order to get
as much as they can, they have genetically enlarged the size of the shark's
brains. You can probably guess where this is headed. Bigger shark brains
equal smarter sharks. And these smart sharks have a distinct attitude
problem. Burrows and her crew, along with Samuel L. Jackson (playing the man
funding their research) are all on board their research lab in the middle of
the Pacific during a severe storm. This is when they realize that the sharks
are now Einsteins with big teeth. They quickly find out that the sharks are
looking for a meal and that they are the main course on the menu.
Let me first start with the flaws of this movie, as minor as they are. The
writers obviously watched Jaws and it's first sequel a few times, since they
do seem to "borrow" a few things from those two movies. This minor lack of
creativity can very quickly be excused though. The writers then proceed to
apparently borrow a few other things from these films, only to end up
throwing the audience for a bit of a loop. Let's be real clear, this is not
a real deep movie (if you'll pardon the pun). It is written with scares in
mind. And on that count, it delivers beautifully. In many cases, I had a
pretty good idea what was going to happen next -- but I didn't care. I was
just having too much fun. Of course, part of the fun in these types of
movies comes at the first of the movie when you can go through the cast a
pick which ones are going to be shark food and which ones are going to
return in any potential sequels. Most times the audience can guess pretty
accurately. This movie is no exception. Although, I can almost guarantee
that nobody is going to be 100% accurate on their predictions.
The special effects are excellent. Every bit of what one would expect from a
summer popcorn flick like this. The underwater sequences are particularly
impressive as are the real stars of the movie -- the three mako sharks. The
sharks were done with a combination of live shots, animatronics and live
action. For the most part they are all blended fairly seamlessly together.
The sets are amazing. This lab is supposed to be an old World War II sub
base and it is very cool. I must admit that I'm always a sucker for the old
flooded-set movies with everyone running around waist deep in water. This
one is particularly well done -- mostly because you are never quite sure
what is swimming around under that water.
Samuel L. Jackson is always a whole lot of fun to watch, so it should come
as no surprise that he is his usual cool self here. Mark my words, English
beauty Saffron Burrows is one her way to superstardom. She has a commanding
presence on screen and rivaled Jackson's talent in the acting department.
Plus, that accent is just so darn sexy. The real surprise is LL Cool J. He
has done a pretty decent job in his past films, but he absolutely,
unequivocally steals this movie. This guy is great. On top of every other
wonderful point of this movie, his scenes were the highlights.
The special effects were very plentiful, but I never found myself being
overpowered by them. The other thing that surprised me was the noticeable
lack of gore in this film. Sure, you have a couple of scenes -- it wouldn't
be a killer shark movie without people being eaten -- but the restraint
shown on the old blood and guts was commendable. It seems as though
everything that Renny Harlin tried in this movie worked. That included a
cheesecake shot where Burrows strips down to her skivvies. You almost buy
that she is down to her bra and panties because it is integral to the story
line and not because Harlin wants to show off her fabulous body. Almost, but
not quite. But, if Harlin feels he has to include shots like that, I guess
we are just going to have to suffer through them. Oh, the agony.
I loved this movie. Everything about it was just plain fun. It was scary, it
was fast paced, but above all, it is the kind of movie that makes me
remember why I love going to the movies. Go see Deep Blue Sea -- you will
not be disappointed.

Author
Benjamin Zaretsky
There are two kinds of people out there. There are the kinds who enjoy
movies about thinking sharks that terrorize a demographic slice of
post-Baywatch American society and those who do not. I happen to. The term
"popcorn movie" is a great term and it fitfully describes DBS. The set-up
is pretty blah and the movie doesn't really get going until Samuel L.
Jackson arrives at the shark base--think the island that the dinosaurs
lived on in Jurassic Park only this is a concrete island with titanium
still cages that go all the way down to the ocean floor, and behind those
cages--we'll get to that in a second. 
So Samuel Jackson arrives there and he meets the shark team--our cast of
characters that (I don't remember any of the characters names) are going
to duke it out with the Makos. Now the shark team is assembled to do
something very scientific, they're running tests on the sharks 
and in the course of doing that, they have made the sharks super smart.
And the theme of the film which probably Jurassic Park spear headed, or
you know flagellated upon everyone, is that of "man's complete and utter
idiocy in thinking he can control nature." There it was Disney Dinosaur
land, here in DBS the doctors Dr. Cleavage, Dr. Spritely, Dr. German
accent and Dr. Generation-X are all convinced that they can control the
sharks no problem, no problem. 
Well surprise, surprise they can't. A tropical storm blows in and wreaks
havoc (think Jurassic Shark now) and the sharks get loose and the audience
gets to play the baiting game, trying to figure out who will end up alive
at the end of the film and who will just end up. Because there are three
very smart and very angry Makos on the loose. The humans try and get to
safety with the sharks close on their tale,  and here the script features
some nice twists and a handful of "gosh I wouldn't want to die that way"
scenes. 
The directing is right on, and Renny Harlin does some really cool things
such as this one point where everyone is trapped in this huge elevator
shaft and the water is filling up from below and there is a huge fireball
looming from above. I was like "hey man the hot and the cold." The
technological and goretastic thrills are there and the performances are
strong (especially Ice Cube as a charming cook) but and here is where I'm
forced to hearken back to JAWS (blah, blah right). That dorsal fin in Jaws
is one of the coolest cinematic treats of all time. Seeing it course
through the water--really something, really something. Here in DBS you get
the whole shark thanks to computer graphic doo-dads and it looks real,
down to the pearly whites--but I found myself missing that dorsal fin
zipping through Martha's Vineyard like it did. Hey Hollywood! Quit showing
me what everything looks like, let me imagine the scary stuff (i.e. that
witch project thing I keep hearing so much about). 
The design of the film is that everyone is trapped underwater in this
concrete viewing thing and they have to get back to the surface and the
sharks are zipping through the corridors, and that makes the whole picture
dark and clautrophobic in a way that it couldn't really help but being.
The next day I'm still caught thinking about when one of the sharks
"disarms" Dr. _____ I mean that was a great moment, but the movie also
made me want to go see JAWS again, just for that lyrical rush the movie
had of being out on the water, just cruising with a mean old dorsal fin
cruising behind you. 
